A simple adherence test for detection of IgM antibodies in typhoid.A simple adherence test to detect IgM antibodies in patients with typhoid is described. The test utilises the IgM-"capture" approach, in which the test serum is applied to microtitration plate wells previously coated with anti-human IgM, followed by application of a stained Salmonella typhi antigen suspension which shows adherence in positive cases. By this test, 58 (95%) of 61 sera from confirmed cases of typhoid possessed IgM antibodies to the H or O or both antigens of S. typhi. In patients for whom a diagnosis of typhoid was based only on a significant Widal-test titre, 31 (41%) of 76 sera had IgM antibodies to the H or O or both antigens of S. typhi. Some cross-reactivity of the IgM antibodies was detected, especially with the O antigens of S. paratyphi A and B. A total of 82 sera from non-typhoidal fevers (leptospirosis, typhus, dengue fever) showed no reactivity in this test. In normal sera there was no detectable IgM to the O antigen of S. typhi and only a small number (3.9%) had low levels of IgM to the H antigen. The significance and potential importance of this simple, sensitive, specific and economical test is discussed.Serodiagnosis of Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi and S. enterica serovars Paratyphi A, B and C human infections.The aim of this study was to evaluate an immunoassay for the detection of human serum antibodies to the LPS and flagellar antigens of Salmonella Typhi and Salmonella Paratyphi A, B and C, and to the Vi capsular polysaccharide of S. Typhi and S. Paratyphi C. A total of 330 sera were used; these originated from 15 patients who were culture-positive for S. Typhi and 15 healthy controls, together with 300 sera submitted to the Laboratory of Enteric Pathogens for Salmonella serodiagnosis. By SDS-PAGE/immunoblotting, all 15 sera from culture-positive patients had serum antibodies to the 9,12 LPS antigens and 10 had antibodies to the 'd' flagellar antigens. Of the 300 reference sera, 22 had antibodies to the 9,12 LPS antigens, one to the 1,4,5,12 LPS antigens and 12 to the 6,7 LPS antigens. Only two sera had antibodies to flagellar antigens, one of which bound to the 'b' and the other to the 'd' antigen. An ELISA was developed that successfully detected serum antibodies to the Vi capsular polysaccharides, but because of the kinetics of serum antibody production to the Vi, these antibodies may be of limited value in the serodiagnosis of acute infection with S. Typhi and S. Paratyphi C. The immunoassays described here provide a sensitive means of detecting serum antibodies to the LPS, flagellar and Vi antigens of S. Typhi and S. Paratyphi, and constitute a viable replacement for the Widal assay for the screening of sera. The Salmonella serodiagnosis protocols described here are the new standard operating procedures used by the Health Protection Agency's National Salmonella Reference Centre based in the Laboratory of Enteric Pathogens, Colindale, UK.Serology of typhoid fever in an area of endemicity and its relevance to diagnosis.Currently, the laboratory diagnosis of typhoid fever is dependent upon either the isolation of Salmonella enterica subsp. enterica serotype Typhi from a clinical sample or the detection of raised titers of agglutinating serum antibodies against the lipopolysaccharide (LPS) (O) or flagellum (H) antigens of serotype Typhi (the Widal test). In this study, the serum antibody responses to the LPS and flagellum antigens of serotype Typhi were investigated with individuals from a region of Vietnam in which typhoid is endemic, and their usefulness for the diagnosis of typhoid fever was evaluated. The antibody responses to both antigens were highly variable among individuals infected with serotype Typhi, and elevated antibody titers were also detected in a high proportion of serum samples from healthy subjects from the community. In-house enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISAs) for the detection of specific classes of anti-LPS and antiflagellum antibodies were compared with other serologically based tests for the diagnosis of typhoid fever (Widal TO and TH, anti-serotype Typhi immunoglobulin M [IgM] dipstick, and IDeaL TUBEX). At a specificity of > or =0.93, the sensitivities of the different tests were 0.75, 0.55, and 0.52 for the anti-LPS IgM, IgG, and IgA ELISAs, respectively; 0.28 for the antiflagellum IgG ELISA; 0.47 and 0.32 for the Widal TO and TH tests, respectively; and 0.77 for the anti-serotype Typhi IgM dipstick assay. The specificity of the IDeaL TUBEX was below 0.90 (sensitivity, 0.87; specificity, 0.76). The serological assays based on the detection of IgM antibodies against either serotype Typhi LPS (ELISA) or whole bacteria (dipstick) had a significantly higher sensitivity than the Widal TO test when used with a single acute-phase serum sample (P < or = 0.007). These tests could be of use for the diagnosis of typhoid fever in patients who have clinical typhoid fever but are culture negative or in regions where bacterial culturing facilities are not available.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay detection of Salmonella serotype typhi antigens in urine.We developed and evaluated an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) using monoclonal antibodies to capture somatic antigen 9 (O9), flagellar antigen d (Hd), and the Vi capsular polysaccharide antigen (Vi) from the urine of persons with and without typhoid fever. Sequential urine samples were collected from 44 patients with blood culture-confirmed typhoid fever and from two control groups. The first control group included patients with brucellosis (n = 12) and those with clinically diagnosed, non-typhoid, acute, febrile illness (n = 27). The second control group was a sample of healthy volunteer laboratory workers (n = 11). When assessed relative to date of fever onset, sensitivity was highest during the first week for all three antigens: Vi was detected in the urine of nine (100%) patients, O9 in 4 (44%) patients, and Hd in 4 (44%) patients. Sequential testing of two urine samples from the same patient improved test sensitivity. Combined testing for Vi with O9 and Hd produced a trend towards increased sensitivity without compromising specificity. The specificity for Vi exceeded 90% when assessed among both febrile and healthy control subjects, but was only 25% when assessed among patients with brucellosis. Detection of urinary Vi antigen with this ELISA shows promise for the diagnosis of typhoid fever, particularly when used within the first week after fever onset. However, positive reactions for Vi antigen in patients with brucellosis must be understood before urinary Vi antigen detection can be developed further as a useful rapid diagnostic test.Comparative evaluation of two rapid Salmonella-IgM tests and blood culture in the diagnosis of enteric fever.Enteric fever is a major public health problem in developing countries like India. An early and accurate diagnosis is necessary for a prompt and effective treatment. We have evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of two Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests (Typhidot-IgM and Enteroscreen-IgM) as compared to blood culture in rapid and early diagnosis of enteric fever.A total of 2,699 patients' serum samples were tested by Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests and blood culture. Patients were divided into two groups. Test group - patients with enteric fever and blood culture positives for Salmonella Typhi; and three types of Controls, i.e. patients with non-enteric fever illnesses, normal healthy controls and patients positive for S. Paratyphi- A. In addition to this we have also evaluated the significance of positive Salmonella-IgM tests among blood culture-negative cases.The overall sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the Typhidot-IgM test and Enteroscreen-IgM test considering blood culture as gold standard were 97.29% and 88.13%, 97.40% and 87.83%, 98.18% and 92.03%, 96.15% and 82.27%, respectively. Typhidot-IgM test was found to be significantly more sensitive and specific as compared to Enteroscreen-IgM. Among blood culture-negative patients, Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests detected 72.25% additional cases of enteric fever. Although the Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests are meant to diagnose S. Typhi only, but these tests detect S. Paratyphi- A also. Thirty-eight patients who were blood culture-positive for S. Paratyphi- A were also positive by Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests.Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests offer an advantage of increased sensitivity, rapidity, early diagnosis and simplicity over blood culture.Typhoid fever in Malaysian children.A prospective study of 102 children with bacteriologically confirmed typhoid fever, admitted to Hospital Universiti Sains Malaysia over 5 years was conducted. The average age at presentation was 91.3 (range 6 - 159) months. Fever (900%), abdominal pain (56%) and diarrhoea (44%) were common symptoms. Findings included: hepatomegaly (85.3%), splenomegaly (27.5%), anaemia (31%), leukopenia (15%). thrombocytopenia (26%), positive Widal (62.5%) and Typhidot test (96%). Patients were treated with ampicillin (n = 54) or chloramphenicol (n = 49) and 1/3 developed complications like hepatitis (n = 19), bone marrow suppression (n = 8) and paralytic ileus (n = 7). A patient with splenomegaly, thrombocytopenia or leukopenia was at higher risk of developing complications.Rapid detection of early typhoid fever in endemic community children by the TUBEX O9-antibody test.Typhoid remains a global public health problem, and quick accurate immunodiagnosis is needed. Here, we examined the performance of the 5-min TUBEX O9-antibody detection kit in 243 outpatients (mostly children and infants) in their first week of fever and 57 healthy subjects in the Bangladesh community. Based on culture results, TUBEX was 91.2% (31/34) sensitive and 82.3% (172/209) specific in febrile subjects. However, specificity was better in nonfebrile healthy subjects (89.5%, 51/57) or in febrile individuals who serologically had dengue fever (90.5%, 57/63), suggesting that some culture-negative febrile individuals could be truly typhoidal. These individuals were also positive in an anti-crude O9 enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and the Widal test. Regression analysis of the TUBEX and ELISA results showed good concordance between them, better with the combined IgM-IgG ELISA than with IgM alone, suggesting that TUBEX detects IgM antibodies not necessarily by themselves, as previously reported, but with the help of IgG antibodies.Antibody response in typhoid fever in endemic Indonesia and the relevance of serology and culture to diagnosis.Culture and serology were performed on blood and serum samples collected at or shortly after admission from 473 patients presented with suspected clinical typhoid. Clinical symptoms at first presentation including confusion, hepatomegaly, splenomegaly, abdominal pain, anemia, and gastrointestinal bleeding were non-specific as they were observed even more often in non-typhoid patients. Culture confirmed the diagnosis in 65.3% of the patients with typhoid fever as the final diagnosis. The sensitivity (58%) and specificity (98.1%) of a rapid dipstick assay for the detection of S. typhi-specific immunoglobulin M were somewhat lower than those of culture but higher than those of the Widal test. The dipstick assay thus may well be used in the serodiagnosis of typhoid in situation where culture facilities are not available. Combination of test results of dipstick and culture improved sensitivity to 82.5%. In laboratories that perform blood culture the dipstick assay may be used as a rapid screening tests to facilitate a rapid diagnosis. Sensitivity of the dipstick assay strongly increased with duration of illness and was higher for culture positive than for culture negative patients. Duration of illness, and different pathogen and host factors including dose of infection, pathogenicity and antigenicity, and prior antibiotic use are likely to influence the immune response, therefore the result of the dipstick assay. Duration of illness and presence of S. typhi in the blood are major factors that determine severity of disease.Rapid serodiagnosis of typhoid fever by dot enzyme immunoassay in an endemic area.A dot enzyme immunoassay (EIA) using 50-kD outer-membrane proteins (OMPs) of Salmonella typhi was compared with the Widal test for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever in 109 febrile children admitted to a hospital in an endemic area. In the culture-positive typhoid group, the initial dot EIA was positive in 40 of 42 cases and the initial Widal test was positive in 41. In the culture-negative clinical typhoid group, both the dot EIA and the Widal test were positive in 17 of 18 cases. In the nontyphoidal fever group, the dot EIA was negative in all of 49 cases and the Widal test was negative in 44. With culture used as the gold standard, the dot EIA is as sensitive as the Widal test (95% vs. 98%), has a similar high negative predictive value (96% vs. 98%), and is more specific (75% vs. 67%). In addition, the dot EIA offers the advantages of simplicity, speed, early diagnosis, economy, and flexibility (i.e., other diagnostic tests can be conducted simultaneously).Rapid serologic diagnosis of pediatric typhoid fever in an endemic area: a prospective comparative evaluation of two dot-enzyme immunoassays and the Widal test.We evaluated the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of two dot-enzyme-linked immunoassays (Typhidot and Typhidot-M; Malaysian Biodiagnostic Research SDN BHD, Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia), assessing IgG and IgM antibodies against the outer membrane protein (OMP) of Salmonella typhi, and the Widal test in comparison with blood culture in a consecutive group of children with suspected typhoid fever. Of 97 children with suspected typhoid fever, the disease was confirmed bacteriologically in 46 (47%), whereas 25 (26%) were considered to have typhoid fever on clinical grounds. An alternative diagnosis was made in 26 (27%). The Typhidot and Typhidot-M were superior to the Widal test in their diagnostic sensitivity and specificity, although values (sensitivity = 85-94% and specificity = 77-89%) were significantly lower than in other regional reports. The lower specificity of the Typhidot in our series may represent regional differences in the genomic structure and plasticity of the OMP of S. typhi and merits further evaluation of these tests in diverse geographic locations.Validation of a new serology-based dipstick test for rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever.Currently, no reliable diagnostic test is available for typhoid fever. One serology-based dipstick test, developed indigenously, was validated in this study. Preserved sera from 336 fever patients with known culture results for Salmonella Typhi were blindly tested by the Widal test and the new assay. Analytical sensitivities, specificities, and efficiencies for the new assay versus the Widal test were 68.8% versus 62.5%, 71.1% versus 37.1%, and 70.5% versus 43.2%, respectively (p < 0.001), considering S. Typhi-positive samples as gold standards. Thereafter, fresh sera from 102 hospital-attending children with clinical typhoid fever (including 20 confirmed nontyphoidal cases as control) were tested by both methods and analyzed statistically. The diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, and efficiency were 51.2%, 85%, and 57.8% for the new assay, and 43.9%, 65%, and 48% for the Widal test, respectively. Overall performance ability of the new assay was not better than the Widal test (p > 0.5). Further improvement of the new point-of-care typhoid assay is recommended before implementation in the field setup.Comparison of passive haemagglutination test with Widal agglutination test for serological diagnosis of typhoid fever in an endemic area.A passive haemagglutination test, using sheep red blood cells sensitised with Salmonella typhi lipopolysaccharide, was compared with the Widal test for the serological diagnosis of typhoid fever in an endemic area. The results obtained on sera from 152 patients with bacteriologically confirmed typhoid and 183 patients who did not have typhoid were analysed in terms of sensitivity, specificity, simplicity, and rapidity of the respective tests. The passive haemagglutination test was found to be more sensitive (80%) than the S typhi O antigen (71%) but marginally less sensitive than the H antigen (82%) of the Widal test. The false positive rate on control sera was 1.2% and 6.6%, respectively, for the Widal O and H antigens, and 1.6% for the passive haemagglutination test. Our findings indicate that the passive haemagglutination test is comparable with the Widal test for the serological diagnosis of typhoid fever in endemic areas, but is more simple, rapid, and economic. The passive haemagglutination test may be a useful alternative to the Widal test for the serological diagnosis of typhoid fever in busy microbiology laboratories in areas in which the disease is endemic.Evaluation of dipstick serologic tests for diagnosis of brucellosis and typhoid Fever in egypt.Two dipstick assays for the detection of Brucella- and typhoid-specific immunoglobulin M, recently developed by the Royal Tropical Institute of The Netherlands, were evaluated by use of 85 plasma samples from Egyptian patients. Both dipsticks were simple and accurate rapid diagnostic assays, and they can be useful adjuncts for the diagnosis of typhoid fever and brucellosis.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever.A Reverse Passive Haemagglutination Test (RPHA) was designed for the detection of Salmonella typhi antigen and rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever. Two per cent fresh sheep RBC's were coated with 32 micrograms/ml of immunoglobulin. The minimal detectable level of the antigen was 1250 micrograms/ml. Cross reactions were observed with the samples of patients suffering from Salmonella paratyphi A and pseudomonas infections. The RPHA established was used for the detection of S. typhi antigen in culture broths from 100 patients with clinically suspected typhoid fever with culture and/or widal positive, 50 patients with septicemia caused by bacteria other than S. typhi and 50 normal, afebrile healthy controls. It was found that the sensitivity and specificity of this assay was 70% and 92% respectively.Comparative study of dot enzyme immunoassay (Typhidot-M) and Widal test in the diagnosis of typhoid fever.We compared the sensitivity and specificity of Typhidot-M and Widal test with blood culture (gold standard) for diagnosing typhoid fever in 105 children aged 1-15 years admitted with clinical suspicion of typhoid fever. Of the 105 cases, blood culture was positive for S.typhi in 41 (39%) children, Widal test was positive in 48 (45.7%) and Typhidot-M was positive in 78 (74.3%) cases. Sensitivity and specificity of Typhidot-M was 92.6% and 37.5% while sensitivity and specificity of Widal test was 34.1% and 42.8%, respectively. In children with fever of less than 7 days duration, Typhidot-M was positive in 97%, compared to 24.2% by Widal test. Typhidot-M is a simple and sensitive test for early diagnosis of typhoid fever in children.Evaluation of serological diagnostic tests for typhoid fever in Papua New Guinea using a composite reference standard.Typhoid fever remains a major global health problem. A major impediment to improving outcomes is the lack of appropriate diagnostic tools, which have not significantly improved in low-income settings for 100 years. We evaluated two commercially available rapid diagnostic tests (Tubex and TyphiDot), a prototype (TyphiRapid TR-02), and the commonly used single-serum Widal test in a previously reported high-burden area of Papua New Guinea. Samples were collected from 530 outpatients with axillary temperatures of ≥37.5°C, and analysis was conducted on all malaria-negative samples (n = 500). A composite reference standard of blood culture and PCR was used, by which 47 participants (9.4%) were considered typhoid fever positive. The sensitivity and specificity of the Tubex (51.1% and 88.3%, respectively) and TyphiDot (70.0% and 80.1%, respectively) tests were not high enough to warrant their ongoing use in this setting; however, the sensitivity and specificity for the TR-02 prototype were promising (89.4% and 85.0%, respectively). An axillary temperature of ≥38.5°C correlated with typhoid fever (P = 0.014). With an appropriate diagnostic test, conducting typhoid fever diagnosis only on patients with high-grade fever could dramatically decrease the costs associated with diagnosis while having no detrimental impact on the ability to accurately diagnose the illness.Typhoid fever among hospitalized febrile children in Siem Reap, Cambodia.Typhoid fever was confirmed by positive blood culture in 5 (3.7%) of 134 febrile children hospitalized in Cambodia. Typhoid was suspected in an additional 25 (18.7 %) blood culture-negative children based on: a positive immunoglobulin M lateral flow assay (IgMFA) (16); a positive polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for Salmonella typhi (2); or clinical assessment (7). The specificity of the IgMFA and PCR assays requires further study.Prospective evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test Typhidot for typhoid fever.Typhoid fever still continues to be a major public health problem around the world. A simple, reliable and affordable rapid diagnostic test has been a long felt need of the clinicians. We therefore prospectively evaluated the sensitivity and specificity of Typhidot test.The study was carried out between January 2002 and December 2003, on a total of 563 samples from patients clinically suspected to have typhoid fever; blood culture as well as serum for Typhidot test were received.Of the 563 samples, Typhidot test and blood culture were positive in 36 patients, both the tests were negative for 503 patients. Typhidot test was positive for 9 patients with S. Paratyphi A infection. The sensitivity and specificity of the test using blood culture as gold standard were 92.3 and 98.8 per cent respectively for the typhoid fever.Typhidot test is rapid, easy to perform and reliable test for diagnosing typhoid fever, useful for small less equipped laboratories as well as for those with better facilities.Evaluation in Papua New Guinea of a urine coagglutination test and a Widal slide agglutination test for rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever.Two simple rapid tests for the laboratory diagnosis of typhoid fever were evaluated, a coagglutination test for detecting Salmonella typhi antigens in urine and a Widal slide agglutination for detecting serum antibodies. Ninety-two culture-confirmed typhoid cases were compared with 64 non-typhoid fever patients, 50 close contacts of typhoid patients, 30 vaccinated staff and 72 healthy community members. A strong urine Vi coagglutination was found to be 86.5% sensitive and 91.8% specific for typhoid, but was not always easy to read. The slide Widal H was found to be 99% sensitive and 95% specific whereas the slide Widal O was 98% sensitive and 98% specific. These data suggest that a single slide Widal O, at a reciprocal titre of 40, is the most suitable rapid test for the diagnosis of typhoid in a population with low typhoid antibody levels in the community, few other cross-reacting Salmonella infections, and a tendency for patients to present late in the infection.Diagnosis of enteric fever caused by Salmonella spp. in Vietnam by a monoclonal antibody-based dot-blot ELISA.Enteric fever caused by Salmonella spp. is prevalent in Vietnam. None of the currently available diagnostic methods meets the ideal criteria on rapidity, simplicity, sensitivity, specificity, cost-effectiveness and practicality for developing areas. In this study, a recently developed monoclonal antibody-based dot-blot ELISA was used in comparison with the hemoculture method and the classical Widal test for diagnosis of salmonellosis in 171 Vietnamese patients presenting with clinical features of enteric fever. Urine samples of 50 healthy counterparts were used as negative controls. Salmonella spp. were isolated from 77 of 171 patients (45%) while 98 and 111 patients were positive by dot-blot ELISA and Widal test, respectively. The diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the ELISA performed on three serial urine samples collected at 2 hour intervals of the 171 patients were 92.2%, 71.3%, 80.7%, 72.4% and 91.8%, respectively when compared with the culture method. The Widal test performed on acute and convalescence serum samples showed 87.0%, 46.8%, 68.4%, 60.4% and 83.3% diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive and negative predictive values, respectively when compared with the bacterial culture method. Kappa coefficience revealed very good agreement beyond chance between the MAb-based ELISA and the culture method. The ELISA was not reactive when tested on urine samples of 50 healthy individuals which indicates 100% specificity. The Salmonella antigenuria of the patients as detected by ELISA lasted 10.3+/-3.9 days after initiating antibiotic treatment. The MAb-based dot-blot ELISA is easy to perform. It is rapid, sensitive, specific, inexpensive, and non-invasive and does not require equipment, thus is suitable for developing areas. It can detect acute/recent infection and can be used for evaluation of the efficacy of the treatment.Typhidot M and Diazo test vis-à-vis blood culture and Widal test in the early diagnosis of typhoid fever in children in a resource poor setting.Typhoid fever is a major public health problem. A test which is simple, reliable and can be carried out in small laboratories is the need of the hour. We prospectively evaluated typhidot M and Diazo tests vis-à-vis blood culture and Widal test in children.Patients aged 6 months to 12 years, having fever of more than four days duration with clinical suspicion of typhoid fever were enrolled. Patients in whom other diagnosis was made served as control. The tests under scrutiny were validated against blood culture and then all the four tests were evaluated among patients who presented in the first week of illness.Blood culture was positive in only 27.3% of the cases. Among these culture positive cases, typhidot M test had the highest sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of 90% (95% CI = 74.4-96.5), 100% (95% CI = 90.1-100), 100% (95% CI = 87.5-100), and 92.1% (95% CI = 79.2-97.3) respectively. Diazo test ranked next with sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of 86.7% (95% CI = 70.3-94.7), 85.7% (95% CI = 70.6-93.7), 83.9% (95% CI = 67.4-92.9), 88.2% (95% CI = 73.4-95.3) respectively. Among clinically suspected typhoid cases, the overall sensitivity, of blood culture, Widal, typhidot M, Diazo was 27.3% (95% CI = 19.8- 36.3), 64.6% (95% CI = 55.3-72.9), 89.1% (95% CI = 81.9-93.7), 80.9% (95% CI = 72.6-87.2) respectively. In the first week of illness, typhidot M showed the best sensitivity [86.2% (95% CI = 69.4-94.5)] followed by Diazo [79% (95% CI = 61.6-90.2)], Widal [41.4% (95% CI = 25.5-59.3)] and blood culture [31% (95% CI = 17.3-49.2)].Both Typhidot M and Diazo are good screening tests for the diagnosis of typhoid fever. Typhidot M is superior to Diazo but the latter is more suitable to resource poor settings being economic and easy to perform.A simple and rapid diagnostic test for typhoid fever.Barber protein sensitized latex particles were used in the latex agglutination test for the diagnosis of typhoid fever and the result compared with that of Widal 'O' and 'H' agglutination test. The latex agglutination test was positive in all 20 bacteriologically proved typhoid patients, in 81 of 85 (95.3%) typhoid suspected patients, and only in 2 of 85 (2.3%) blood donors. In contrast, the positive rates were 60% for both 'O' and 'H' Widal agglutinations in bacteriologically proved typhoid patients, 34.2% and 71.7% respectively in typhoid suspected patients, and none of blood donors were positive. The sensitivity and specificity of the latex agglutination test were 100% and 97.6% respectively with positive and negative predictive values of 90.9% and 100% respectively. The latex agglutination test may be particularly useful for the presumptive diagnosis of typhoid fever in remote health centres.Multidrug-resistant typhoid fever with neurologic findings on the Malawi-Mozambique border.Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi causes an estimated 22 million cases of typhoid fever and 216 000 deaths annually worldwide. We investigated an outbreak of unexplained febrile illnesses with neurologic findings, determined to be typhoid fever, along the Malawi-Mozambique border.The investigation included active surveillance, interviews, examinations of ill and convalescent persons, medical chart reviews, and laboratory testing. Classification as a suspected case required fever and ≥1 other finding (eg, headache or abdominal pain); a probable case required fever and a positive rapid immunoglobulin M antibody test for typhoid (TUBEX TF); a confirmed case required isolation of Salmonella Typhi from blood or stool. Isolates underwent antimicrobial susceptibility testing and subtyping by pulsed-field gel electrophoresis (PFGE).We identified 303 cases from 18 villages with onset during March-November 2009; 214 were suspected, 43 were probable, and 46 were confirmed cases. Forty patients presented with focal neurologic abnormalities, including a constellation of upper motor neuron signs (n = 19), ataxia (n = 22), and parkinsonism (n = 8). Eleven patients died. All 42 isolates tested were resistant to ampicillin, chloramphenicol, and trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole; 4 were also resistant to nalidixic acid. Thirty-five of 42 isolates were indistinguishable by PFGE.The unusual neurologic manifestations posed a diagnostic challenge that was resolved through rapid typhoid antibody testing in the field and subsequent blood culture confirmation in the Malawi national reference laboratory. Extending laboratory diagnostic capacity, including blood culture, to populations at risk for typhoid fever in Africa will improve outbreak detection, response, and clinical treatment.Sensitivity and specificity of typhoid fever rapid antibody tests for laboratory diagnosis at two sub-Saharan African sites.To evaluate three commercial typhoid rapid antibody tests for Salmonella Typhi antibodies in patients suspected of having typhoid fever in Mpumalanga, South Africa, and Moshi, United Republic of Tanzania.The diagnostic accuracy of Cromotest(®) (semiquantitative slide agglutination and single tube Widal test), TUBEX(®) and Typhidot(®) was assessed against that of blood culture. Performance was modelled for scenarios with pretest probabilities of 5% and 50%.In total 92 patients enrolled: 53 (57.6%) from South Africa and 39 (42.4%) from the United Republic of Tanzania. Salmonella Typhi was isolated from the blood of 28 (30.4%) patients. The semiquantitative slide agglutination and single-tube Widal tests had positive predictive values (PPVs) of 25.0% (95% confidence interval, CI: 0.6-80.6) and 20.0% (95% CI: 2.5-55.6), respectively. The newer typhoid rapid antibody tests had comparable PPVs: TUBEX(®), 54.1% (95% CI: 36.9-70.5); Typhidot(®) IgM, 56.7% (95% CI: 37.4-74.5); and Typhidot(®) IgG, 54.3% (95% CI: 36.6-71.2). For a pretest probability of 5%, PPVs were: TUBEX(®), 11.0% (95% CI: 6.6-17.9); Typhidot(®) IgM, 9.1% (95% CI: 5.8-14.0); and Typhidot(®) IgG, 11.0% (6.3-18.4). For a pretest probability of 50%, PPVs were: TUBEX(®), 70.2% (95% CI: 57.3-80.5); Typhidot(®) IgM, 65.6% (95% CI: 54.0-75.6); and Typhidot(®) IgG, 70.0% (95% CI: 56.0-81.1).Semiquantitative slide agglutination and single-tube Widal tests performed poorly. TUBEX(®) and Typhidot(®) may be suitable when pretest probability is high and blood cultures are unavailable, but their performance does not justify deployment in routine care settings in sub-Saharan Africa.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever by detection of Barber protein and Vi antigen of Salmonella serotype typhi.Co-agglutination (coagg) and latex agglutination (LA) tests were used for the detection of Salmonella serotype Typhi Vi and Barber protein (BP) antigens in sera from five groups of individuals (A-E). Group A consisted of 30 blood culture-positive cases of typhoid fever and group B consisted of 30 suspected cases of typhoid fever who had sterile blood cultures but positive Widal tests. Thirty cases of pyrexia of unknown origin (PUO) were placed in group C, while group D consisted of 15 cases of septicaemia caused by organisms other than Salmonella serotype Typhi. Group E comprised 50 normal healthy individuals with no history of typhoid fever or TAB vaccination in the previous 5 years. The Vi-LA test performed best with 96.7% of group A sera and 90% of group B sera giving positive results. No false positive results and only 2.58% false negative results were obtained with this test. Considering patients with positive blood culture results or positive Widal tests as true positives, the sensitivities of the Vi-LA, BP-LA, Vi-coagg and BP-coagg tests were 93.3, 91.7, 83.3 and 86.7%, respectively. The specificities of these tests were 100, 98.5, 98.5 and 98.5%, respectively. It is suggested that the Vi-LA test can be used for the rapid and early diagnosis of typhoid fever.Short report: prospective evaluation of a multi-test strip for the diagnoses of scrub and murine typhus, leptospirosis, dengue Fever, and Salmonella typhi infection.A multi-test strip dotblot immunoassay for the diagnosis of typhoid fever, scrub typhus, murine typhus, dengue virus infection and leptospirosis was evaluated in Thai adults presenting to hospital with acute, undifferentiated fever. The kit gave multiple positive test results in 33 of 36 patients with defined infections and was therefore not a useful admission diagnostic tool.Typhoid fever in Kuala Lumpur and a comparative evaluation of two commercial diagnostic kits for the detection of antibodies to Salmonella typhi.The aim of this study was to compare two commercial kits, theTyphidot and the PanBio ELISA with the present Widal test. Demographic data for all serodiagnosed cases for the years 1991-1998 were collected. From this data, 144 were selected as samples for comparative evaluation of the commercial kits. Fifty sera were culture positive for Salmonella typhi, 50 were culture negative but clinically diagnosed as typhoid fever and Widal positive and 44 were serodiagnosed as enteric of which 21 were culture positive for other Salmonella species, 20 were serodiagnosed for other febrile illnesses and three sera culture positive for other species of enterobacteriaceae. The specificity, sensitivity and efficiency of the tests were calculated with the positive culture for S. typhi as the gold standard. Sensitivity, specificity and efficiency of test for Typhidot and Typhidot M kits were 98%, 76.6% and 84.0% and PanBio ELISA were 78%, 80% and 79.9%. The two commercial kits evaluated were found to be less time consuming and easier to perform than Widal. The Typhidot M seems to be a practical alternative in the field and in small hospitals with lesser facilities.Diagnosis of typhoid fever by detection of Salmonella typhi antigen in urine.A monoclonal antibody specific for group D Salmonella antigen 9 was used in an indirect enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for detecting the antigen in urine specimens collected from patients with clinical typhoid fever in Jakarta, Indonesia. The ELISA had a sensitivity of 95% in identifying patients in whom Salmonella typhi was isolated from hemocultures, 73% in patients in whom S. typhi was isolated from stool specimens, and 40% in patients in whom the organism was isolated from bone marrow cultures. Among patients in whom S. typhi was isolated from blood cultures, the ELISA had a sensitivity of 65% when a single urine specimen was examined and 95% when serially collected urine specimens were examined. A dot blot immunoassay performed on a nitrocellulose filter in parallel had a sensitivity of 85%, versus 83% for the plate ELISA in which S. typhi was isolated from blood, bone marrow, and/or stool specimens. Since S. typhi antigen is intermittently excreted in the urine of patients with typhoid fever, serially collected urine from patients with typhoid should be tested for antigen 9.Typhoid outbreak in Songkhla, Thailand 2009-2011: clinical outcomes, susceptibility patterns, and reliability of serology tests.To determine the clinical manifestations and outcomes, the reliability of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi (S ser. Typhi) IgM and IgG rapid tests, and the susceptibility patterns and the response to treatment during the 2009-2011 typhoid outbreak in Songkhla province in Thailand.The medical records of children aged <15 years with S ser. Typhi bacteremia were analysed. The efficacy of the typhoid IgM and IgG rapid tests and susceptibility of the S ser. Typhi to the current main antibiotics used for typhoid (amoxicillin, ampicillin, cefotaxime, ceftriaxone, co-trimoxazole, and ciprofloxacin), were evaluated.S ser. Typhi bacteremia was found in 368 patients, and all isolated strains were susceptible to all 6 antimicrobials tested. Most of the patients were treated with ciprofloxacin for 7-14 days. The median time (IQR) of fever before treatment and duration of fever after treatment were 5 (4, 7) days and 4 (3, 5) days, respectively. Complications of ascites, lower respiratory symptoms, anemia (Hct <30%), and ileal perforation were found in 7, 7, 22, and 1 patients, respectively. None of the patients had recurrent infection or died. The sensitivities of the typhoid IgM and IgG tests were 58.3% and 25.6% respectively, and specificities were 74.1% and 50.5%, respectively.Most of the patients were diagnosed at an early stage and treated with a good outcome. All S ser. Typhi strains were susceptible to standard first line antibiotic typhoid treatment. The typhoid IgM and IgG rapid tests had low sensitivity and moderate specificity.Evaluation of TUBEX-TF and OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo rapid tests to detect Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi infection during a typhoid outbreak in Harare, Zimbabwe.Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi, the causative agent of typhoid, is endemic in most parts of the world especially in Africa. Reliable and rapid diagnosis of the bacterium is therefore critical for confirmation of all suspected typhoid cases. In many parts of Zimbabwe, laboratory capacity to isolate the microorganism by culture method as a way of diagnosis has limitations. In this study, two rapid serological kits, TUBEX-TF and OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo, were evaluated for possible expeditious diagnosis of Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi infection during a typhoid outbreak in Zimbabwe.Blood was collected from patients with clinical signs and symptoms of typhoid in Harare, Zimbabwe during an outbreak. The standard culture method was used to diagnose the disease. Two rapid kits, the TUBEX-TF and OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo, were also used in parallel to diagnose typhoid according to manufacturers' instructions. The diagnostic accuracy of the two kits was evaluated using the culture method as the gold standard.From all the cases diagnosed by the blood culture (n = 136), we enrolled 131 patients for the TUBEX-TF and 136 for the OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo tests. With the culture method as a reference standard, we found that TUBEX-TF test was 100% sensitive and 94.12% specific, with 63.16% positive and 100% negative predictive values (NPVs) and the OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo test was 100% sensitive and 94.35% specific, with 63.16% positive and 100% NPVs.Our results indicated that TUBEX-TF and OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo rapid tests were useful tools for the rapid diagnosis of Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi infection during typhoid outbreaks in Zimbabwe. The tests performed very well in laboratory evaluations of blood culture-confirmed typhoid cases in Harare, Zimbabwe.Standardisation of the Widal test.Optimizing typhoid fever case definitions by combining serological tests in a large population study in Hechi City, China.Blood culture-based diagnosis can only detect a fraction of the total burden of Salmonella enterica subsp. enterica serovar Typhi. The objective of the study was to detect additional typhoid fever cases through serological tests. A total of 1732 prolonged fever episodes were evaluated using three serological tests, Widal, Tubex and Typhidot-M in a typhoid fever endemic area of southern China. A case definition which included a positive Widal test (TO>or=80 & TH>A), a positive Tubex test (>or=4) and a positive Typhidot-M test, increased the detection of cases by more than twofold from 13 to 28 cases. The case definition has a specificity of 100% and a sensitivity of 39%. Case definitions based on combinations of serological tests can detect additional typhoid fever cases with higher specificity than a single serological test. Improved case detection is essential to understand the true disease burden and can help to boost the power of intervention trials.Use of paired serum samples for serodiagnosis of typhoid fever.Using an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay we demonstrate that, in adult patients with typhoid fever, the sensitivity of a serological test based on the detection of anti-lipopolysaccharide immunoglobulin G is increased when used with paired serum samples taken 1 week apart.Clinical value of Tubex and Typhidot rapid diagnostic tests for typhoid fever in an urban community clinic in Bangladesh.Tubex and Typhidot, rapid tests for typhoid fever, performed well in evaluations conducted in hospital settings among patients with culture-confirmed typhoid fever. We evaluated these tests in a community clinic in Bangladesh. Blood samples were obtained from 867 febrile patients for culture, Typhidot and Tubex tests. Considering the 43 blood culture-confirmed cases of typhoid fever as typhoid positive and the 24 other confirmed bacteremia cases as typhoid negative, Tubex was 60% sensitive and 58% specific, with 90% positive and 58% negative predictive values (NPVs); Typhidot was 67% sensitive and 54% specific, with 85% positive and 81% NPVs. When blood culture-negative patients and other bacteremia cases together were considered typhoid negative, positive predictive values were only 14% for Tubex and 13% for Typhidot, increasing to only 38% and 20% when restricted to patients with > or = 7 days of fever. We conclude that the value of Tubex and Typhidot tests for typhoid fever diagnosis in a community clinic in urban Bangladesh is low.A comparative study of the typhidot (Dot-EIA) and Widal tests in blood culture positive cases of typhoid fever.Seventy-six blood culture positive typhoid cases and forty-eight controls were studied. The typhidot test was positive in 74 (97.36%) cases, with a sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of 96%, 89.5%, and 95%, respectively, compared to the Widal test which was positive in 56 (73.68%) cases with a sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value of 72%, 87%, and 87%, respectively (P = 0.001). In the control group, seven (14.5%) cases tested positive for the Widal test and two (4.16%) for the typhidot (P = 0.001), yielding the sensitivity and specificity for the Widal test and the typhidot test of 63% and 83%, and 85% and 97%, respectively. We conclude that the Dot-EIA (enzyme immunoassay; typhidot) is a more sensitive and specific test which is easy to perform and more reliable compared to the Widal test and that it is useful in early therapy.Clinical aspects of typhoid fever in two rural Nigerian hospitals. A prospective study.During a prospective study among 234 patients admitted with fever in two rural hospitals in West and Central Nigeria 38 cases of typhoid fever were found. The diagnosis was based on extensive serological testing in the Netherlands. The diazotest was introduced but appeared not helpful. The ordinary Widal test was not fully reliable. Eighty five percent of the patients responded to chloramphenicol. The course of typhoid fever in West Nigeria was more severe than in Central Nigeria. The findings are compared with those of similar studies of typhoid fever.The dilemma of widal test - which brand to use? a study of four different widal brands: a cross sectional comparative study.Serodiagnosis of typhoid fever by Widal test based on demonstrating the presence of agglutinins (antibodies) in the serum of an infected patient, against the H (flagellar) and O (somatic) antigens of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi has been associated with many debates. This is why the aim of this study was to: (i) Compare the diagnostic accuracy of four different commercial kits used to perform Widal test (Remel, BioSystems, Dialab and Biotec). (ii) Compare the sensitivity and specificity of both anti-O and anti-H antibodies. (iii) Compare the validity of single versus paired serum samples with a rising titer for the diagnosis of typhoid fever.Duplicate serum samples were obtained from 150 patients clinically diagnosed as typhoid fever patients. Moreover, single serum samples were obtained from 25 patients with febrile diseases other than typhoid fever. All samples were tested using the four different Widal brands and Salmonella Typhi IgM anti-LPS ELISA.-The results of Widal tests differed markedly using the four Widal brands in terms of sensitivity and specificity at three cut-off values of 1/80, 1/160 and 1/320. Remel brand gave the highest sensitivities and the lowest specificities and Dialab brand gave the highest specificities and the lowest sensitivities for both anti-O and anti-H antibodies at the three cut-off values.-Four fold rise in the antibodies titer was not demonstrable among clinically diagnosed typhoid fever patients-H agglutinins were less sensitive and less specific than O agglutinins-Widal test results showed marked discrepancies using different Widal brands. None of the serum samples of the typhoid fever patients showed four fold rise in the antibody titers. Raised O agglutinins were of slightly greater diagnostic value than raised H agglutinins.Widal test done sequentially using two brands could be of value in typhoid fever diagnosis. Single serum sample could be used for typhoid fever diagnosis relying on anti O titer.Evaluation of new-generation serologic tests for the diagnosis of typhoid fever: data from a community-based surveillance in Calcutta, India.Although typhoid fever is confirmed by culture of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi, rapid and simple diagnostic serologic tests would be useful in developing countries. We examined the performance of Widal test in a community field site and compared it with Typhidot and Tubex tests for diagnosis of typhoid fever. Blood samples were collected from 6697 patients with fever for > or =3 days for microscopy, culture, and serologic testing and from randomly selected 172 consenting healthy individuals to assess the baseline Widal anti-Typhi O lipopolysaccharide antibody (anti-TO) and anti-Typhi H flagellar antibody (anti-TH) titers. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) of the 3 serologic tests were calculated using culture-confirmed typhoid fever cases as "true positives" and paratyphoid fever and malaria cases as "true negatives". Comparing cutoff values for the Widal test, an anti-TO titer of 1/80 was optimal with 58% sensitivity, 85% specificity, 69% PPV, and 77% NPV. Sensitivity was increased to 67% when the Widal test was done on the 5th day of illness and thereafter. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of Typhidot and Tubex were not better than Widal test. There is a need for more efficient rapid diagnostic test for typhoid fever especially during the acute stage of the disease. Until then, culture remains the method of choice.Evaluation of a simple and rapid dipstick assay for the diagnosis of typhoid fever in Indonesia.To support the clinical diagnosis of typhoid fever in Indonesia, where most hospitals and health centres have no facilities for culture, a rapid dipstick assay for the detection of Salmonella typhi-specific IgM antibodies was evaluated on serum samples from 127 patients clinically suspected of having typhoid fever. In a single blood sample collected on admission to hospital, the sensitivity of the dipstick assay was 69.8% when compared with bone marrow culture and 86.5% when compared with blood culture. The specificity as calculated for the group of patients with suspected typhoid fever but a negative culture result was calculated to be 88.9%. Of 80 patients with febrile illnesses other than typhoid fever, reactivity was observed in only three patients with dengue haemorrhagic fever. The assay uses stabilised components that can be stored outside the refrigerator, does not require special equipment, and may be of use in remote health facilities that have no culture facilities.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever by co-agglutination in an Indian hospital.Detection of Salmonella typhi infection by a co-agglutination assay for specific O, H and Vi antigens and by blood culture were compared for 110 patients with suspected typhoid fever. Blood cultures were positive for S. typhi in 25.5% of patients. Co-agglutination tests with patients' serum and with blood culture supernates gave positive results in 70.9% and 67.3% of cases respectively. S. typhi antigens Hd and O9 were detected in patients' serum by co-agglutination in 96.4% of blood culture-positive, and 62.2% of blood culture-negative patients. Co-agglutination results were uniformly negative with serum samples from a control group of 50 healthy individuals, 20 patients with febrile non-typhoid infectious disease and 20 patients with non-infectious febrile disease. Of the 25 patients with suspected typhoid fever who had not received prior antibiotic treatment, 88% yielded positive blood cultures and 96% gave positive results in serum co-agglutination tests. By contrast, of the 85 patients who had received prior antibiotics, only 7% yielded positive blood cultures, but 63.5% gave positive results in serum co-agglutination tests. Co-agglutination tests with serum offer a simple, rapid, sensitive, specific and economical method for the early diagnosis of typhoid fever.The TUBEX typhoid test detects current Salmonella infections.Evaluation of the diagnostic accuracy of a typhoid IgM flow assay for the diagnosis of typhoid fever in Cambodian children using a Bayesian latent class model assuming an imperfect gold standard.Rapid diagnostic tests are needed for typhoid fever (TF) diagnosis in febrile children in endemic areas. Five hundred children admitted to the hospital in Cambodia between 2009 and 2010 with documented fever (≥ 38°C) were investigated using blood cultures (BCs), Salmonella Typhi/Paratyphi A real-time polymerase chain reactions (PCRs), and a Typhoid immunoglobulin M flow assay (IgMFA). Test performance was determined by conventional methods and Bayesian latent class modeling. There were 32 cases of TF (10 BC- and PCR-positive cases, 14 BC-positive and PCR-negative cases, and 8 BC-negative and PCR-positive cases). IgMFA sensitivity was 59.4% (95% confidence interval = 41-76), and specificity was 97.8% (95% confidence interval = 96-99). The model estimate sensitivity for BC was 81.0% (95% credible interval = 54-99). The model estimate sensitivity for PCR was 37.8% (95% credible interval = 26-55), with a specificity of 98.2% (95% credible interval = 97-99). The model estimate sensitivity for IgMFA (≥ 2+) was 77.9% (95% credible interval = 58-90), with a specificity of 97.5% (95% credible interval = 95-100). The model estimates of IgMFA sensitivity and specificity were comparable with BCs and better than estimates using conventional analysis.Detection of Salmonella typhi protein antigen in serum and urine: a value for diagnosis of typhoid fever in an endemic area.Using haemoculture as the gold standard, a double antibody sandwich ELISA for the detection of Salmonella typhi Barber protein antigen (BP) was compared with the Widal test. Specimens used were serum and urine obtained from normal healthy individuals and from patients with typhoid fever, paratyphoid fever, pyrexia caused by other bacteria and pyrexia with negative haemoculture. The ELISA for antigenuria gave a significantly higher sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and positive predictive value than the Widal test (p less than 0.05). The ELISA for antigenaemia gave a significantly higher sensitivity and positive predictive value only. All other values were not significantly different. The timing of specimen collection was critical for sensitivity in the ELISA for antigenaemia and antigenuria, and the best results could be obtained by carrying out both assays simultaneously. The clearance of BP from serum into urine occurred around 16 days after the onset of fever in one patient. In two patients, BP could be detected in sera up to 3 weeks after the onset of fever. In two patients, serum BP could still be detected although haemoculture was negative.Development of a one-step immunochromatographic strip test using gold nanoparticles for the rapid detection of Salmonella typhi in human serum.An immunochromatographic strip test using gold nanoparticles was developed for the rapid detection of Salmonella typhi (S. typhi) in human serum. The strip test based on the principle of sandwich immunoassay by the specific binding of antigens from S. typhi O901 and antibody of S. typhi O901 on a nitrocellulose membrane. Antibody-gold nanoparticle conjugate was used as the label and was coated onto a glass fiber membrane, which was used as a conjugate pad. To create a test and control zone, antibody of S. typhi O901 and an anti-IgG were dotted on the nitrocellulose membrane, respectively. Positive samples were displayed as red dots at the test and control zones of the nitrocellulose membrane, while negative samples resulted in a red dot only in the control zone. The limit of detection (LOD) was found to be 1.14×10(5) cfu mL(-1), which could be visually detected by the naked eye within 15 min. This strip test provided a lower detection limit and analysis time than a dot blot immunoassay (8.88×10(6) cfu mL(-1) for LOD and 110 min for reaction time). In addition, our immunochromatographic strip test was employed to detect S. typhi in human serum effectively, with high accuracy. This strip test offers great promise for a rapid, simple and low-cost analysis of S. typhi.Evaluation of a typhoid/paratyphoid diagnostic assay (TPTest) detecting anti-Salmonella IgA in secretions of peripheral blood lymphocytes in patients in Dhaka, Bangladesh.Rapid and reliable diagnostic assays for enteric (typhoid and paratyphoid) fever are urgently needed. We report the characterization of novel approach utilizing lymphocyte secretions, for diagnosing patients with enteric fever by the TPTest procedure.TPTest detects Salmonella-specific IgA responses in lymphocyte culture supernatant. We utilized TPTest in patients with suspected enteric fever, patients with other illnesses, and healthy controls. We also evaluated simplified modifications of TPTest for adaptation in laboratories with limited facilities and equipment.TPTest was positive in 39 (27 typhoid and 12 paratyphoid A) patients confirmed by blood culture and was negative in 74 healthy individuals. Among 32 individuals with other illnesses, 29 were negative by TPTest. Of 204 individuals with suspected enteric fever who were negative by blood culture, 44 were positive by TPTest and the patients were clinically indistinguishable from patients with confirmed bacteremia, except they were more likely to be under 5 years of age. We evaluated simplifications in TPTest, including showing that lymphocytes could be recovered using lysis buffer or buffy coat method as opposed to centrifugation, that incubation of cells at 37°C did not require supplemental CO2, and that results were available for majority of samples within 24 hours. Positive results by TPTest are transient and revert to negative during convalescence, supporting use of the test in endemic areas. The results can also be read using immunodot blot approach as opposed to ELISA. Since no true gold standard currently exists, we used a number of definitions of true positives and negatives. TPTest had sensitivity of 100% compared to blood culture, and specificity that ranged from 78-97% (73-100, 95% CI), depending on definition of true negative.The TPTest is useful for identification of patients with enteric fever in an endemic area, and additional development of simplified TPTest is warranted.One-step 2-minute test to detect typhoid-specific antibodies based on particle separation in tubes.Typhoid fever is caused by Salmonella typhi. Detection of anti-S. typhi antibodies in the patient is a useful diagnostic aid. Among the various methods developed over the years for this purpose, the Widal test, based on bacterial agglutination, has remained the most widely used, even though it is neither specific nor sensitive. Its popularity stems from the fact that it is simple to use and inexpensive. We describe a new test which also uses a simple one-step procedure but is more rapid and accurate than the Widal. The new test (TUBEX) detects anti-Salmonella O9 (both immunoglobulin M [IgM] and IgG) antibodies in patients by inhibiting the binding between an anti-O9 IgM monoclonal antibody (MAb) conjugated to colored latex particles and S. typhi lipopolysaccharide (LPS) conjugated to magnetic latex particles. The reactants are mixed in a specially designed microtube for 2 min, and the result is read based on the resultant color of the supernatant following forced sedimentation of the magnetic beads. In the absence of inhibitory antibodies, there is a color change (from blue to red) due to cosedimentation of the indicator particles with the magnetic particles, whereas if these antibodies are present, they prevent such a change to a degree dependent on their concentration. Preliminary examination of TUBEX using the anti-O9 MAb and irrelevant MAbs as inhibitors revealed the test to be specific and reproducible, with an analytical sensitivity of 16 micrograms per ml of antibody. The reagents remained stable for at least 9 months when kept at 4 degrees C. In the examination of 16 stored sera obtained from 14 patients with proven cases of typhoid fever and 78 serum samples from 75 subjects without typhoid fever, TUBEX was found to be 100% sensitive and 100% specific. The nontyphoid group comprised 26 healthy blood donors, 30 antinuclear antibody (ANA)-negative patients, 9 ANA-positive patients, of whom 1 was positive for anti-DNA antibody, 4 typhus patients, and 6 septicemic patients. In addition, the sera obtained from 11 patients clinically diagnosed as having typhoid fever were all positive in the test. The TUBEX results correlated to some extent, albeit insignificantly (r = 0.38, P = 0.07), with those of an enzyme-linked immunoassay (ELISA) which used a similar detection format (inhibition) and reagents (S. typhi LPS and anti-O9 antibody). TUBEX correlated very well with ELISAs which detected anti-S. typhi LPS IgM (r = 0.58, P = 0.003) or IgG (r = 0.54, P = 0.006) antibodies from the typhoid patients. There was no correlation with the Widal test. The TUBEX test, if performed on slides (instead of tubes) or with soluble antigen (instead of antigen-conjugated magnetic beads), suffered significantly in sensitivity. Direct agglutination tests using LPS-conjugated indicator particles performed either on slides or in microwells also failed to detect antibodies from the majority of typhoid patients. Thus, TUBEX appears to be well designed and well suited for use in the laboratory or by the bedside as a simple, rapid aid to the routine diagnosis of typhoid fever.Comparison of the diagnostic value of local Widal slide test with imported Widal slide test.A laboratory study comparing the Widal slide agglutination test using local antigens produced by Mekar Jaya Diagnostica (SAT-MJD) with imported antigens (Murex, Abbott) was carried out on 55 sera of typhoid fever patients with positive blood culture and 56 sera of non-typhoid febrile patients. The SAT-MJD antigens consisted of a mixture of 5 different phage-types of S. typhi dominantly found in Indonesia. This study revealed the following results: the diagnostic sensitivity of local and imported antigens was 83.93%, the diagnostic specificity of local antigens was higher than the imported antigens ie 82.14% compared with 64.28%, the diagnostic efficiency of local antigens was 82.88% compared with 73.87% of the imported antigens. The diagnostic positive and negative predictive values of the local antigens were 80.70% and 83.63%, respectively. The imported antigen revealed diagnostic positive and negative predictive values of 69.69% and 80%, respectively. The diagnostic specificity and efficiency of local antigens were significantly different (p < 0.02 and p < 0.05) from the imported antigens. The local antigens have some advantages. There was no variation in within-run and between-day test, compared with a 6.6% variation shown by the imported antigen. The test results obtained 5 minutes after mixing the serum with antigens reduced the possibility of false-positive and false-negative results. The cost of local antigens is lower than the imported antigens. Based on these data, the Widal SAT-MJD has a reliable diagnostic value and can be used in small laboratories, such as primary health centers (Puskesmas).Evaluation of a simple blood culture amplification and antigen detection method for diagnosis of Salmonella enterica serovar typhi bacteremia.In most areas where typhoid is endemic, laboratory diagnosis is not possible due to the lack of appropriate facilities. We investigated whether the combination of blood culture amplification of Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi with an S. Typhi antigen rapid diagnostic test (RDT) could be an accurate and inexpensive tool for the accelerated diagnosis of patients with acute typhoid in Laos. For a panel of 23 Gram-negative reference pathogens, the Standard Diagnostics (catalog no. 15FK20; Kyonggi-do, South Korea) RDT gave positive results for S. Typhi NCTC 8385, S. Typhi NCTC 786 (Vi negative), Salmonella enterica serovar Enteritidis (ATCC 13076), and Salmonella enterica serovar Ndolo NCTC 8700 (all group D). In a prospective study of 6,456 blood culture bottles from 3,028 patients over 15 months, 392 blood culture bottles (6.1%) from 221 (7.3%) patients had Gram-negative rods (GNRs) seen in the blood culture fluid. The sensitivity, negative predictive value, specificity, and positive predictive value were 96.7%, 99.5%, 97.9%, and 87.9%, respectively, for patients with proven S. Typhi bacteremia and 91.2%, 98.4%, 98.9%, and 93.9% for patients with group D Salmonella. The median (range) number of days between diagnosis by RDT and reference assays was 1 (-1 to +2) day for those with confirmed S. Typhi. The use of antigen-based pathogen detection in blood culture fluid may be a useful, relatively rapid, inexpensive, and accurate technique for the identification of important causes of bacteremia in the tropics.Comparative evaluation of latex agglutination (LAT) and coagglutination (COAG) tests for rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever.Comparison of serological test kits for diagnosis of typhoid fever in the Philippines.We evaluated four recent antibody-detection kits for typhoid fever by using 177 febrile patients from our hospital, in 75 of whom Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi grew. TUBEX performed best, achieving 94.7% sensitivity and 80.4% specificity. Typhidot, SD Bioline Typhoid, and Mega Salmonella were less specific and, in most cases, less sensitive.Comparison of a rapid commercial test, Enterocheck WB(®), with automated blood culture for diagnosis of typhoid fever.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever is very important in the timely initiation of therapy.To evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of the Enterocheck WB(®) test.In a prospective study, the sensitivity and specificity of Enterocheck WB(®) that detects IgM antibodies to Salmonella typhi were compared with blood culture using BacT/Alert.Four hundred and fifty patients with suspected typhoid fever were assessed both by blood culture and Enterocheck WB(®); 100 of them were either Enterocheck WB(®)-positive or blood culture-positive or both for S. typhi. Both tests were positive in 47 of the 100 patients. In 45 patients, Enterocheck WB(®) was positive but blood culture was negative. In eight cases, Enterocheck was negative but blood culture was positive. Using blood culture as the gold standard, the sensitivity of Enterocheck WB(®) was 85.5%, specificity 88.6%, negative predictive value 97.7% and positive predictive value 51.1%.The Enterocheck WB(®) test can be performed at the bedside in 15 minutes and is a useful rapid method for diagnosis of typhoid fever.Detection of IgM antibody against region IV flagellin of Salmonella paratyphi A.Salmonella paratyphi A is a pathogenic bacterium that causes paratyphoid fever. The current laboratory diagnostic techniques are unsatisfactory. To improve diagnosis, a plasmid (pSK-8E) encoding phase 1 flagellin gene nucleotide position 452-890 from S. paratyphi A has been constructed. The recombinant protein expressed from the plasmid has been used to develop an indirect ELISA for IgM antibody detection. Sera from patients with hemoculture positive for S. paratyphi A, S. typhi, other gram-positive and gram-negative bacteria, and dengue hemorrhagic fever as well as from healthy control subjects were tested. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the test were 56.9%, 98.8%, 90.6% and 92.1%, respectively. Since the sensitivity was low, the explanation for this result was investigated. It was found that the sensitivity of the test could be increased to 83.3% if the sera were obtained 9-12 days after onset of fever. The sera obtained earlier or later gave only 33.3% and 66.6% sensitivity, respectively. This result suggests that the IgM antibody detection assay which we have developed is a valuable tool for diagnosis of S. paratyphi A infection when the serum samples are taken at the appropriate time.Diagnosis of typhoid fever by Dot enzyme immunoassay in an endemic region.To compare the results of Dot Enzyme Immunoassay (EIA) and concomitantly performed blood culture for the diagnosis of typhoid fever.The results of Dot Enzyme Immunoassay (EIA) of patients who also had blood cultures/bone marrow culture performed at the same time were analyzed. The period of study spans between April 1997-September 1997.A total of 1760 Dot Enzyme Immunoassays were performed from April 1997 to September 1997. Of these, only 128 (7.2%) cases had concomitantly performed blood/bone marrow cultures. Therefore, the study was narrowed down to these 128 cases. Sixty-nine cases were culture positive for S. typhi. Of these culture proven cases, IgM antibodies by Dot EIA were positive only in 49 (71%) cases while 20 (28.9%) of culture proven cases remained negative for IgM antibodies.Taking blood/bone marrow culture as gold standard, the sensitivity of Dot EIA was found to be 71% while specificity was found to be 43%. The predictive value of the positive test was found to be 59.7% and that of a negative test was found to be 56.5%.The diagnostic accuracy of three rapid diagnostic tests for typhoid fever at Chittagong Medical College Hospital, Chittagong, Bangladesh.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of three rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for typhoid fever in febrile hospitalised patients in Bangladesh.Febrile adults and children admitted to Chittagong Medical College Hospital, Bangladesh, were investigated with Bact/Alert(®) blood cultures and real-time PCR to detect Salmonella enterica Typhi and Paratyphi A and assays for Rickettsia, leptospirosis and dengue fever. Acute serum samples were examined with the LifeAssay (LA) Test-it™ Typhoid IgM lateral flow assay detecting IgM antibodies against S. Typhi O antigen, CTKBiotech Onsite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo Rapid-test cassette lateral flow assay detecting IgG and IgM antibodies against S. Typhi O and H antigens and SD Bioline line assay for IgG and IgM antibodies against S. Typhi proteins.In 300 malaria smear-negative febrile patients [median (IQR) age of 13.5 (5-31) years], 34 (11.3%) had confirmed typhoid fever: 19 positive by blood culture for S. Typhi (three blood PCR positive) and 15 blood culture negative but PCR positive for S. Typhi in blood. The respective sensitivity and specificity of the three RDTs in patients using a composite reference standard of blood culture and/or PCR-confirmed typhoid fever were 59% and 61% for LifeAssay, 59% and 74% for the CTK IgM and/or IgG, and 24% and 96% for the SD Bioline RDT IgM and/or IgG. The LifeAssay RDT had a sensitivity of 63% and a specificity of 91% when modified with a positive cut-off of ≥2+ and analysed using a Bayesian latent class model.These typhoid RDTs demonstrated moderate diagnostic accuracies, and better tests are needed.Typhoid is over-reported in Embu and Nairobi, Kenya.The paper looks at the usefulness of the Widal agglutination test in the context of variable normal antibody titres in two different populations in Kenya, and in comparison to the blood culture method of diagnosis. It presents a prospective case-control study. We examined 846 blood cultures and an equal number of serum samples, and 782 stools from adults who presented at two study sites; Kenyatta National Hospital and one hospital and 3 clinics in Embu District, with symptoms similar to typhoid. Examined also were 360 serum samples and stools from adults who were apparently healthy (controls) who sought routine medical examination at the study sites. From blood cultures, isolation rates for typhoid for Embu (3% ) and Nairobi (2.2%) were not significantly different (p>0.01). In addition the control population from the two study sites did not show any significant background O antibody titre levels characteristic of typhoid endemic areas. All the 7 commonly available Widal test kits including Murex, Europath, Biotech, Humatex, Biosystems, Microsystems and Typhex, that were evaluated for efficacy were equally specific in diagnosis of typhoid by Widal agglutination methods. However, there were minor differences in the sensitivities of the kits. The Widal test method gave a lower sensitivity (81.3%) than specificity (93%) when compared to the culture of blood for diagnosis of typhoid. Going by the reports of typhoid outbreaks in Embu and Nairobi (ca. 20-25% reported prevalence) we conclude that there has been over-reporting probably due to poor methodologies of performing the Widal test. We recommend adequate clinical examination in suspected cases of typhoid in addition to proper Widal in order to improve typhoid diagnosis. Newer improved methods that are more specific and sensitive than the Widal test need to be evaluated in improving laboratory diagnosis of typhoid.Latex agglutination test (LAT) for the diagnosis of typhoid fever.Typhidot test to detect IgG & IgM antibodies in typhoid fever.As typhoid fever is endemic in India, there is a continuing search for a simple test which can be carried out in small laboratories for an early and rapid diagnosis. We have evaluated the Typhidot test for this purpose.The Typhidot test was carried out on coded sera according to the manufacturer's instructions. The test was performed on 30 Widal positive sera, 30 sera from blood culture positive patients, 60 Widal negative sera and 30 samples from patients whose blood culture grew Gram negative bacilli (GNB) other than Salmonella Typhi.Typhidot test was positive for both IgG and IgM in 39 samples, IgM alone in 24 and IgG alone in 2. Of the 30 culture positive samples, 27 were positive by Typhidot. The Typhidot test gave a sensitivity of 100 per cent and specificity of 80 per cent when bacteraemic patients were analysed.The Typhidot is easy to perform, and requires no special equipment or training of staff for interpretation of results. It will be a useful complementary test to blood culture and the Widal test in the diagnosis of typhoid fever.Laboratory evaluation of a simple and rapid latex agglutination assay for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever.A latex agglutination assay for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever was evaluated on samples collected from patients with clinical suspicion of typhoid fever in South Sulawesi, Indonesia, where the disease is endemic. The latex assay is very easy to use, gives a rapid result and may be used as a point-of-care diagnostic test. For acute phase samples collected on average 6 days after the onset of illness, the sensitivity is 42.5% for culture-confirmed patients with typhoid fever and the specificity is 96.9%. The sensitivity improved with the duration of illness from 30.8% for samples collected during the first 4-5 days of illness to 45.5% for samples collected between days 7 and 9, and to 84.6% for the samples collected more than 9 days after the onset of illness. Testing of follow-up samples may further improve sensitivity by demonstrating seroconversion.Simple, rapid, and affordable point-of-care test for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever.We developed a point-of-care test for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever in the format of an immunochromatographic lateral flow assay. The flow assay for typhoid fever is based on the detection of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi lipopolysaccharide-specific immunoglobulin M (IgM) antibodies. The assay was evaluated on serum samples collected in a hospital in South Sulawesi, Indonesia, where typhoid fever is endemic, and the results were compared with culture and Widal test. The sensitivity of this typhoid fever IgM flow assay for samples collected at 1st diagnosis from patients with culture-confirmed typhoid fever was determined to be 59.3%. The sensitivity ranged from 41.2% to 89.5%, depending on the duration of illness. A specificity of 97.8% was calculated based on results obtained for patients with clinical suspicion of typhoid fever that was later excluded. The assay is ideal for use as a point-of-care test in health care centers that lack the expertise and facilities to perform culture or the less specific Widal test. Because of its simplicity, the assay may also be used as a field test in remote areas.Retrospective review of dot enzyme immunoassay test for typhoid fever in an endemic area.Typhoid fever remains a common problem in Malaysia, but for its diagnosis both blood culture and the Widal test have drawbacks. A dot enzyme immunoassay (EIA) has been developed which detects IgM and IgG antibodies to a specific 50 kDa outer membrane protein on Salmonella typhi. This study was performed among outpatients attending the university hospital in Kelantan, a state on the east coast of Peninsular Malaysia where typhoid is endemic. The dot EIA was done on 149 outpatients of all ages in whom typhoid was suspected. Of these, 60 were not analysable due to insufficient data. The other 89 were retrospectively classed as typhoid (total = 21), or not typhoid (total = 68). The criteria for diagnosis of typhoid was either, blood culture was positive, or with blood culture negative, temperature was at least 38 degrees C and Widal O and/or H titer greater than or equal to 1/160. We then compared the diagnosis with the EIA result. For the result where either IgM or IgG was positive, sensitivity was 90%, specificity 91% and negative predictive value 97%. For IgM positive, specificity was 100%. But the specificity of IgG positive alone was reduced by six false positives, which were probably due to persistence of IgG after acute infection. Other cases were found where IgG positive alone appeared in the first week of typhoid fever, probably due to rapid response in a second or subsequent infection. We also found that IgM-producing patients were significantly younger than those showing IgG alone positive.Evaluation of a newly developed ELISA against Widal, TUBEX-TF and Typhidot for typhoid fever surveillance.Typhoid fever is endemic in many parts of the world and represents a major cause of acute febrile illness (AFI). Rapid and accurate laboratory methods for diagnosis of this disease are needed for both patient care and surveillance situations.Serum samples were collected from AFI patients and used to evaluate the performance of a newly developed ELISA assay that uses a mixture of somatic and flagellar antigens to detect the total antibody response against Salmonella enterica subspecies enterica serovar Typhi (S. Typhi) infection. The levels of Ig isotype response (IgG, IgM and IgA) were also evaluated, and results were compared to those of TUBEX-TF and Typhidot commercial kits. Of 234 culture-confirmed typhoid patients, the total Ig ELISA diagnosed 93% compared to 71% using Widal test. This sensitivity level (93%) is higher than that observed for the individual Ig ELISAs (IgG 75%; IgM 79%; IgA 57%) and the commercial tests TUBEX-TF (75%), Typhidot IgM (63%) and Typhidot IgG (28%). An agreement of 78% was achieved between the total Ig ELISA and Widal test. The average specificity of the ELISA was 96%. Using ELISA, up to 200 samples can be tested per run with cost per test at US$0.20.The developed ELISA shows superior sensitivity and specificity, when compared to Widal, TUBEX-TF and Typhidot assays, is more cost effective and allows higher throughput. This method is highly recommended for active surveillance studies or outbreak investigations of typhoid fever.The Widal slide agglutination test, a valuable rapid diagnostic test in typhoid fever patients at the Infectious Diseases Hospital of Jakarta.The Widal slide agglutination test was evaluated as a rapid diagnostic test in typhoid fever patients at the Infectious Diseases Hospital, Jakarta, Indonesia from 1980-1982. The results of the test can be available within 45 minutes of patient admission. The study showed that, among 229 patients with Salmonella typhi-positive typhoid fever and 179 control fever patients, when the Widal O antibody titer was greater than or equal to 1:20 the sensitivity was 53%, the specificity 98%, the positive predictive value 96%, and the negative predictive value 68%. A negative Widal test (O antibody titer less than 1:20) does not provide useful information, but when the O antibody titer is greater than or equal to 1:20 the clinician at the Infectious Diseases Hospital of Jakarta can be 96% certain that the patient has typhoid fever.Comparison of rapid serodiagnostic tests for antigen detection in typhoid fever.Combined rapid (TUBEX) test for typhoid-paratyphoid A fever based on strong anti-O12 response: design and critical assessment of sensitivity.Rapid diagnostics can be accurate but, often, those based on antibody detection for infectious diseases are unwittingly underrated for various reasons. Herein, we described the development of a combined rapid test for two clinically-indistinguishable bacterial diseases, typhoid and paratyphoid A fever, the latter fast emerging as a global threat. By using monoclonal antibodies (mAbs) to bacterial antigens of known chemical structures as probes, we were able to dissect the antibody response in patients at the level of monosaccharides. Thus, a mAb specific for a common lipopolysaccharide antigen (O12) found in both the causative organisms was employed to semi-quantify the amounts of anti-O12 antibodies present in both types of patients in an epitope-inhibition particle-based (TUBEX) immunoassay. This colorimetric assay detected not only anti-O12 antibodies that were abundantly produced, but also, by steric hindrance, antibodies to an adjoining epitope (O9 or O2 in the typhoid or paratyphoid bacillus, respectively). Sensitivity and, particularly, reaction intensities, were significantly better than those obtained using an anti-O9 or anti-O2 mAb-probe in the examination of paired sera from 22 culture-confirmed typhoid patients (sensitivity, 81.8% vs 75.0%) or single sera from 36 culture-confirmed paratyphoid patients (52.8% vs 28.6), respectively. Importantly, sensitivity was better (97.1% for typhoid, 75.0% for paratyphoid) if allowance was made for the absence of relevant antibodies in certain specimens as determined by an independent, objective assay (ELISA)--such specimens might have been storage-denatured (especially the older paratyphoid samples) or procured from non-responders. Benchmarking against ELISA, which revealed high concordance between the two tests, was useful and more appropriate than comparing with culture methods as traditionally done, since antibody tests and culture target slightly different stages of these diseases. Paired sera analysis was insightful, revealing 64% of typhoid patients who had no change in antibody titer over 4-16 days, and 14% with no IgM-IgG class-switching.Assessment and comparative analysis of a rapid diagnostic test (Tubex®) for the diagnosis of typhoid fever among hospitalized children in rural Tanzania.Typhoid fever remains a significant health problem in many developing countries. A rapid test with a performance comparable to that of blood culture would be highly useful. A rapid diagnostic test for typhoid fever, Tubex®, is commercially available that uses particle separation to detect immunoglobulin M directed towards Salmonella Typhi O9 lipopolysaccharide in sera.We assessed the sensitivity and specificity of the Tubex test among Tanzanian children hospitalized with febrile illness using blood culture as gold standard. Evaluation was done considering blood culture confirmed S. Typhi with non-typhi salmonella (NTS) and non - salmonella isolates as controls as well as with non-salmonella isolates only.Of 139 samples tested with Tubex, 33 were positive for S. Typhi in blood culture, 49 were culture-confirmed NTS infections, and 57 were other non-salmonella infections. Thirteen hemolyzed samples were excluded. Using all non - S. Typhi isolates as controls, we showed a sensitivity of 79% and a specificity of 89%. When the analysis was repeated excluding NTS from the pool of controls we showed a sensitivity of 79% and a specificity of 97%. There was no significant difference in the test performance using the two different control groups (p > 0.05).This first evaluation of the Tubex test in an African setting showed a similar performance to those seen in some Asian settings. Comparison with the earlier results of a Widal test using the same samples showed no significant difference (p > 0.05) for any of the performance indicators, irrespective of the applied control group.Clinical application of a dot blot test for diagnosis of enteric fever due to Salmonella enterica serovar typhi in patients with typhoid fever from Colombia and Peru.Clinical application of a dot blot test to detect immunoglobulin G (IgG) (88% sensitivity and specificity) and IgM (12.1% sensitivity and 97% specificity) against flagellar antigen from Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi was performed in Peruvian and Colombian patients with typhoid fever. This test can be used as a good predictor of serovar Typhi infection in regions lacking laboratory facilities and in field studies.Longevity of antibody responses to a Salmonella typhi-specific outer membrane protein: interpretation of a dot enzyme immunosorbent assay in an area of high typhoid fever endemicity.The objective of this study was to investigate the longevity of positive dot enzyme immunosorbent assay (dot EIA) results for IgM and IgG to a Salmonella typhi outer membrane protein in Malaysian children with enteric fever. The patients were children one month to 12 years of age with clinical evidence of typhoid fever, positive blood or stool cultures for S. typhi, and/or a positive Widal test result who were admitted over a two-year period to General Hospital (Kota Bharu, Malaysia). These patients received standard inpatient treatment for enteric fever including chloramphenicol therapy for 14 days. Dot EIA tests were performed as part of clinical and laboratory assessments on admission, at two weeks, and then at 3, 6, 9, 12, 15, 18, and 21 months postdischarge. Assessment of the longevity of positive dot EIA IgM and IgG titers was done by Kaplan-Meier analysis. In 94 evaluable patients, 28% were dot EIA IgM positive but IgG negative on admission, 50% were both IgM and IgG positive, and 22% were IgM negative and IgG positive. Mean persistence of IgM dot EIA positivity was 2.6 months (95% confidence interval = 2.0-3.1 months) and that of IgG was 5.4 months (4.5-6.3 months). There were no significant differences between the three subgroups. Thus, positive IgM and IgG results determined by dot EIA within four and seven months, respectively, following documented or suspected enteric fever in a child from an endemic area should be interpreted with caution. In other clinical situations, the dot EIA remains a rapid and reliable aid to diagnosis.Evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests for typhoid fever.Laboratory diagnosis of typhoid fever requires isolation and identification of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi. In many areas where this disease is endemic, laboratory capability is limited. Recent advances in molecular immunology have led to the identification of sensitive and specific markers for typhoid fever and technology to manufacture practical and inexpensive kits for their rapid detection. We evaluated three commercial kits for serologic diagnosis of typhoid fever. Patients presenting with > or = 4 days of fever were enrolled at two hospitals in Southern Vietnam. Cases were patients with serotype Typhi isolated from blood samples, and controls were patients with other laboratory-confirmed illnesses. Serotype Typhi isolates were confirmed and tested for antimicrobial susceptibility at the Pasteur Institute in Ho Chi Minh City. The Widal test was run at the hospitals and the Pasteur Institute. Sera were shipped frozen to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and tested by using Multi-Test Dip-S-Ticks, TyphiDot, and TUBEX to detect immunoglobulin G (IgG), IgG and IgM, and IgM, respectively. Package insert protocol instructions were followed. We enrolled 59 patients and 21 controls. The sensitivity and specificity findings were as follows: 89 and 53% for Multi-Test Dip-S-Ticks, 79 and 89% for TyphiDot, 78 and 89% for TUBEX, and 64 and 76% for Widal testing in hospitals and 61% and 100% for Widal testing at the Pasteur Institute. For all assays, the sensitivity was highest in the second week of illness. The Widal test was insensitive and displayed interoperator variability. Two rapid kits, TyphiDot and TUBEX, demonstrated promising results.Comparison between DOT EIA IgM and Widal Test as early diagnosis of typhoid fever.A recently developed DOT enzyme immunoassay known as "Typhidot" for detecting IgM antibody against 50 KDa OMP antigen of Salmonella typhi, was evaluated on 100 clinically suspected typhoid fever cases and 40 age-sex matched controls, in the Department of Microbiology, Mymensingh Medical College during, the period from June 2006 to July 2007. Blood culture, Widal test, and DOT EIA for IgM test were performed in all patients. Among 100 clinically suspected typhoid fever cases, 35 were subsequently confirmed on the basis of positive blood culture for S. typhi and/or significant rising titre of Widal test. The DOT EIA IgM test could produce results within 1 hour. The result of the DOT EIA IgM test showed a good diagnostic value for typhoid fever. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of the test was found as 91.42%, 90.00%, 88.88% and 92.30% respectively. On the other hand corresponding values for Widal test were of 42.85%, 85.00%, 71.42% and 62.96% respectively. Thus, The DOT EIA IgM seems to be a practical alternative to Widal test for early diagnosis of typhoid fever.A simple adherence test for detection of IgM antibodies in typhoid.A simple adherence test to detect IgM antibodies in patients with typhoid is described. The test utilises the IgM-"capture" approach, in which the test serum is applied to microtitration plate wells previously coated with anti-human IgM, followed by application of a stained Salmonella typhi antigen suspension which shows adherence in positive cases. By this test, 58 (95%) of 61 sera from confirmed cases of typhoid possessed IgM antibodies to the H or O or both antigens of S. typhi. In patients for whom a diagnosis of typhoid was based only on a significant Widal-test titre, 31 (41%) of 76 sera had IgM antibodies to the H or O or both antigens of S. typhi. Some cross-reactivity of the IgM antibodies was detected, especially with the O antigens of S. paratyphi A and B. A total of 82 sera from non-typhoidal fevers (leptospirosis, typhus, dengue fever) showed no reactivity in this test. In normal sera there was no detectable IgM to the O antigen of S. typhi and only a small number (3.9%) had low levels of IgM to the H antigen. The significance and potential importance of this simple, sensitive, specific and economical test is discussed.Serodiagnosis of Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi and S. enterica serovars Paratyphi A, B and C human infections.The aim of this study was to evaluate an immunoassay for the detection of human serum antibodies to the LPS and flagellar antigens of Salmonella Typhi and Salmonella Paratyphi A, B and C, and to the Vi capsular polysaccharide of S. Typhi and S. Paratyphi C. A total of 330 sera were used; these originated from 15 patients who were culture-positive for S. Typhi and 15 healthy controls, together with 300 sera submitted to the Laboratory of Enteric Pathogens for Salmonella serodiagnosis. By SDS-PAGE/immunoblotting, all 15 sera from culture-positive patients had serum antibodies to the 9,12 LPS antigens and 10 had antibodies to the 'd' flagellar antigens. Of the 300 reference sera, 22 had antibodies to the 9,12 LPS antigens, one to the 1,4,5,12 LPS antigens and 12 to the 6,7 LPS antigens. Only two sera had antibodies to flagellar antigens, one of which bound to the 'b' and the other to the 'd' antigen. An ELISA was developed that successfully detected serum antibodies to the Vi capsular polysaccharides, but because of the kinetics of serum antibody production to the Vi, these antibodies may be of limited value in the serodiagnosis of acute infection with S. Typhi and S. Paratyphi C. The immunoassays described here provide a sensitive means of detecting serum antibodies to the LPS, flagellar and Vi antigens of S. Typhi and S. Paratyphi, and constitute a viable replacement for the Widal assay for the screening of sera. The Salmonella serodiagnosis protocols described here are the new standard operating procedures used by the Health Protection Agency's National Salmonella Reference Centre based in the Laboratory of Enteric Pathogens, Colindale, UK.Serology of typhoid fever in an area of endemicity and its relevance to diagnosis.Currently, the laboratory diagnosis of typhoid fever is dependent upon either the isolation of Salmonella enterica subsp. enterica serotype Typhi from a clinical sample or the detection of raised titers of agglutinating serum antibodies against the lipopolysaccharide (LPS) (O) or flagellum (H) antigens of serotype Typhi (the Widal test). In this study, the serum antibody responses to the LPS and flagellum antigens of serotype Typhi were investigated with individuals from a region of Vietnam in which typhoid is endemic, and their usefulness for the diagnosis of typhoid fever was evaluated. The antibody responses to both antigens were highly variable among individuals infected with serotype Typhi, and elevated antibody titers were also detected in a high proportion of serum samples from healthy subjects from the community. In-house enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISAs) for the detection of specific classes of anti-LPS and antiflagellum antibodies were compared with other serologically based tests for the diagnosis of typhoid fever (Widal TO and TH, anti-serotype Typhi immunoglobulin M [IgM] dipstick, and IDeaL TUBEX). At a specificity of > or =0.93, the sensitivities of the different tests were 0.75, 0.55, and 0.52 for the anti-LPS IgM, IgG, and IgA ELISAs, respectively; 0.28 for the antiflagellum IgG ELISA; 0.47 and 0.32 for the Widal TO and TH tests, respectively; and 0.77 for the anti-serotype Typhi IgM dipstick assay. The specificity of the IDeaL TUBEX was below 0.90 (sensitivity, 0.87; specificity, 0.76). The serological assays based on the detection of IgM antibodies against either serotype Typhi LPS (ELISA) or whole bacteria (dipstick) had a significantly higher sensitivity than the Widal TO test when used with a single acute-phase serum sample (P < or = 0.007). These tests could be of use for the diagnosis of typhoid fever in patients who have clinical typhoid fever but are culture negative or in regions where bacterial culturing facilities are not available.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay detection of Salmonella serotype typhi antigens in urine.We developed and evaluated an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) using monoclonal antibodies to capture somatic antigen 9 (O9), flagellar antigen d (Hd), and the Vi capsular polysaccharide antigen (Vi) from the urine of persons with and without typhoid fever. Sequential urine samples were collected from 44 patients with blood culture-confirmed typhoid fever and from two control groups. The first control group included patients with brucellosis (n = 12) and those with clinically diagnosed, non-typhoid, acute, febrile illness (n = 27). The second control group was a sample of healthy volunteer laboratory workers (n = 11). When assessed relative to date of fever onset, sensitivity was highest during the first week for all three antigens: Vi was detected in the urine of nine (100%) patients, O9 in 4 (44%) patients, and Hd in 4 (44%) patients. Sequential testing of two urine samples from the same patient improved test sensitivity. Combined testing for Vi with O9 and Hd produced a trend towards increased sensitivity without compromising specificity. The specificity for Vi exceeded 90% when assessed among both febrile and healthy control subjects, but was only 25% when assessed among patients with brucellosis. Detection of urinary Vi antigen with this ELISA shows promise for the diagnosis of typhoid fever, particularly when used within the first week after fever onset. However, positive reactions for Vi antigen in patients with brucellosis must be understood before urinary Vi antigen detection can be developed further as a useful rapid diagnostic test.Comparative evaluation of two rapid Salmonella-IgM tests and blood culture in the diagnosis of enteric fever.Enteric fever is a major public health problem in developing countries like India. An early and accurate diagnosis is necessary for a prompt and effective treatment. We have evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of two Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests (Typhidot-IgM and Enteroscreen-IgM) as compared to blood culture in rapid and early diagnosis of enteric fever.A total of 2,699 patients' serum samples were tested by Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests and blood culture. Patients were divided into two groups. Test group - patients with enteric fever and blood culture positives for Salmonella Typhi; and three types of Controls, i.e. patients with non-enteric fever illnesses, normal healthy controls and patients positive for S. Paratyphi- A. In addition to this we have also evaluated the significance of positive Salmonella-IgM tests among blood culture-negative cases.The overall sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the Typhidot-IgM test and Enteroscreen-IgM test considering blood culture as gold standard were 97.29% and 88.13%, 97.40% and 87.83%, 98.18% and 92.03%, 96.15% and 82.27%, respectively. Typhidot-IgM test was found to be significantly more sensitive and specific as compared to Enteroscreen-IgM. Among blood culture-negative patients, Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests detected 72.25% additional cases of enteric fever. Although the Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests are meant to diagnose S. Typhi only, but these tests detect S. Paratyphi- A also. Thirty-eight patients who were blood culture-positive for S. Paratyphi- A were also positive by Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests.Rapid Salmonella-IgM tests offer an advantage of increased sensitivity, rapidity, early diagnosis and simplicity over blood culture.Typhoid fever in Malaysian children.A prospective study of 102 children with bacteriologically confirmed typhoid fever, admitted to Hospital Universiti Sains Malaysia over 5 years was conducted. The average age at presentation was 91.3 (range 6 - 159) months. Fever (900%), abdominal pain (56%) and diarrhoea (44%) were common symptoms. Findings included: hepatomegaly (85.3%), splenomegaly (27.5%), anaemia (31%), leukopenia (15%). thrombocytopenia (26%), positive Widal (62.5%) and Typhidot test (96%). Patients were treated with ampicillin (n = 54) or chloramphenicol (n = 49) and 1/3 developed complications like hepatitis (n = 19), bone marrow suppression (n = 8) and paralytic ileus (n = 7). A patient with splenomegaly, thrombocytopenia or leukopenia was at higher risk of developing complications.Rapid detection of early typhoid fever in endemic community children by the TUBEX O9-antibody test.Typhoid remains a global public health problem, and quick accurate immunodiagnosis is needed. Here, we examined the performance of the 5-min TUBEX O9-antibody detection kit in 243 outpatients (mostly children and infants) in their first week of fever and 57 healthy subjects in the Bangladesh community. Based on culture results, TUBEX was 91.2% (31/34) sensitive and 82.3% (172/209) specific in febrile subjects. However, specificity was better in nonfebrile healthy subjects (89.5%, 51/57) or in febrile individuals who serologically had dengue fever (90.5%, 57/63), suggesting that some culture-negative febrile individuals could be truly typhoidal. These individuals were also positive in an anti-crude O9 enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and the Widal test. Regression analysis of the TUBEX and ELISA results showed good concordance between them, better with the combined IgM-IgG ELISA than with IgM alone, suggesting that TUBEX detects IgM antibodies not necessarily by themselves, as previously reported, but with the help of IgG antibodies.Antibody response in typhoid fever in endemic Indonesia and the relevance of serology and culture to diagnosis.Culture and serology were performed on blood and serum samples collected at or shortly after admission from 473 patients presented with suspected clinical typhoid. Clinical symptoms at first presentation including confusion, hepatomegaly, splenomegaly, abdominal pain, anemia, and gastrointestinal bleeding were non-specific as they were observed even more often in non-typhoid patients. Culture confirmed the diagnosis in 65.3% of the patients with typhoid fever as the final diagnosis. The sensitivity (58%) and specificity (98.1%) of a rapid dipstick assay for the detection of S. typhi-specific immunoglobulin M were somewhat lower than those of culture but higher than those of the Widal test. The dipstick assay thus may well be used in the serodiagnosis of typhoid in situation where culture facilities are not available. Combination of test results of dipstick and culture improved sensitivity to 82.5%. In laboratories that perform blood culture the dipstick assay may be used as a rapid screening tests to facilitate a rapid diagnosis. Sensitivity of the dipstick assay strongly increased with duration of illness and was higher for culture positive than for culture negative patients. Duration of illness, and different pathogen and host factors including dose of infection, pathogenicity and antigenicity, and prior antibiotic use are likely to influence the immune response, therefore the result of the dipstick assay. Duration of illness and presence of S. typhi in the blood are major factors that determine severity of disease.Rapid serodiagnosis of typhoid fever by dot enzyme immunoassay in an endemic area.A dot enzyme immunoassay (EIA) using 50-kD outer-membrane proteins (OMPs) of Salmonella typhi was compared with the Widal test for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever in 109 febrile children admitted to a hospital in an endemic area. In the culture-positive typhoid group, the initial dot EIA was positive in 40 of 42 cases and the initial Widal test was positive in 41. In the culture-negative clinical typhoid group, both the dot EIA and the Widal test were positive in 17 of 18 cases. In the nontyphoidal fever group, the dot EIA was negative in all of 49 cases and the Widal test was negative in 44. With culture used as the gold standard, the dot EIA is as sensitive as the Widal test (95% vs. 98%), has a similar high negative predictive value (96% vs. 98%), and is more specific (75% vs. 67%). In addition, the dot EIA offers the advantages of simplicity, speed, early diagnosis, economy, and flexibility (i.e., other diagnostic tests can be conducted simultaneously).Rapid serologic diagnosis of pediatric typhoid fever in an endemic area: a prospective comparative evaluation of two dot-enzyme immunoassays and the Widal test.We evaluated the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of two dot-enzyme-linked immunoassays (Typhidot and Typhidot-M; Malaysian Biodiagnostic Research SDN BHD, Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia), assessing IgG and IgM antibodies against the outer membrane protein (OMP) of Salmonella typhi, and the Widal test in comparison with blood culture in a consecutive group of children with suspected typhoid fever. Of 97 children with suspected typhoid fever, the disease was confirmed bacteriologically in 46 (47%), whereas 25 (26%) were considered to have typhoid fever on clinical grounds. An alternative diagnosis was made in 26 (27%). The Typhidot and Typhidot-M were superior to the Widal test in their diagnostic sensitivity and specificity, although values (sensitivity = 85-94% and specificity = 77-89%) were significantly lower than in other regional reports. The lower specificity of the Typhidot in our series may represent regional differences in the genomic structure and plasticity of the OMP of S. typhi and merits further evaluation of these tests in diverse geographic locations.Validation of a new serology-based dipstick test for rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever.Currently, no reliable diagnostic test is available for typhoid fever. One serology-based dipstick test, developed indigenously, was validated in this study. Preserved sera from 336 fever patients with known culture results for Salmonella Typhi were blindly tested by the Widal test and the new assay. Analytical sensitivities, specificities, and efficiencies for the new assay versus the Widal test were 68.8% versus 62.5%, 71.1% versus 37.1%, and 70.5% versus 43.2%, respectively (p < 0.001), considering S. Typhi-positive samples as gold standards. Thereafter, fresh sera from 102 hospital-attending children with clinical typhoid fever (including 20 confirmed nontyphoidal cases as control) were tested by both methods and analyzed statistically. The diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, and efficiency were 51.2%, 85%, and 57.8% for the new assay, and 43.9%, 65%, and 48% for the Widal test, respectively. Overall performance ability of the new assay was not better than the Widal test (p > 0.5). Further improvement of the new point-of-care typhoid assay is recommended before implementation in the field setup.Comparison of passive haemagglutination test with Widal agglutination test for serological diagnosis of typhoid fever in an endemic area.A passive haemagglutination test, using sheep red blood cells sensitised with Salmonella typhi lipopolysaccharide, was compared with the Widal test for the serological diagnosis of typhoid fever in an endemic area. The results obtained on sera from 152 patients with bacteriologically confirmed typhoid and 183 patients who did not have typhoid were analysed in terms of sensitivity, specificity, simplicity, and rapidity of the respective tests. The passive haemagglutination test was found to be more sensitive (80%) than the S typhi O antigen (71%) but marginally less sensitive than the H antigen (82%) of the Widal test. The false positive rate on control sera was 1.2% and 6.6%, respectively, for the Widal O and H antigens, and 1.6% for the passive haemagglutination test. Our findings indicate that the passive haemagglutination test is comparable with the Widal test for the serological diagnosis of typhoid fever in endemic areas, but is more simple, rapid, and economic. The passive haemagglutination test may be a useful alternative to the Widal test for the serological diagnosis of typhoid fever in busy microbiology laboratories in areas in which the disease is endemic.Evaluation of dipstick serologic tests for diagnosis of brucellosis and typhoid Fever in egypt.Two dipstick assays for the detection of Brucella- and typhoid-specific immunoglobulin M, recently developed by the Royal Tropical Institute of The Netherlands, were evaluated by use of 85 plasma samples from Egyptian patients. Both dipsticks were simple and accurate rapid diagnostic assays, and they can be useful adjuncts for the diagnosis of typhoid fever and brucellosis.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever.A Reverse Passive Haemagglutination Test (RPHA) was designed for the detection of Salmonella typhi antigen and rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever. Two per cent fresh sheep RBC's were coated with 32 micrograms/ml of immunoglobulin. The minimal detectable level of the antigen was 1250 micrograms/ml. Cross reactions were observed with the samples of patients suffering from Salmonella paratyphi A and pseudomonas infections. The RPHA established was used for the detection of S. typhi antigen in culture broths from 100 patients with clinically suspected typhoid fever with culture and/or widal positive, 50 patients with septicemia caused by bacteria other than S. typhi and 50 normal, afebrile healthy controls. It was found that the sensitivity and specificity of this assay was 70% and 92% respectively.Comparative study of dot enzyme immunoassay (Typhidot-M) and Widal test in the diagnosis of typhoid fever.We compared the sensitivity and specificity of Typhidot-M and Widal test with blood culture (gold standard) for diagnosing typhoid fever in 105 children aged 1-15 years admitted with clinical suspicion of typhoid fever. Of the 105 cases, blood culture was positive for S.typhi in 41 (39%) children, Widal test was positive in 48 (45.7%) and Typhidot-M was positive in 78 (74.3%) cases. Sensitivity and specificity of Typhidot-M was 92.6% and 37.5% while sensitivity and specificity of Widal test was 34.1% and 42.8%, respectively. In children with fever of less than 7 days duration, Typhidot-M was positive in 97%, compared to 24.2% by Widal test. Typhidot-M is a simple and sensitive test for early diagnosis of typhoid fever in children.Evaluation of serological diagnostic tests for typhoid fever in Papua New Guinea using a composite reference standard.Typhoid fever remains a major global health problem. A major impediment to improving outcomes is the lack of appropriate diagnostic tools, which have not significantly improved in low-income settings for 100 years. We evaluated two commercially available rapid diagnostic tests (Tubex and TyphiDot), a prototype (TyphiRapid TR-02), and the commonly used single-serum Widal test in a previously reported high-burden area of Papua New Guinea. Samples were collected from 530 outpatients with axillary temperatures of ≥37.5°C, and analysis was conducted on all malaria-negative samples (n = 500). A composite reference standard of blood culture and PCR was used, by which 47 participants (9.4%) were considered typhoid fever positive. The sensitivity and specificity of the Tubex (51.1% and 88.3%, respectively) and TyphiDot (70.0% and 80.1%, respectively) tests were not high enough to warrant their ongoing use in this setting; however, the sensitivity and specificity for the TR-02 prototype were promising (89.4% and 85.0%, respectively). An axillary temperature of ≥38.5°C correlated with typhoid fever (P = 0.014). With an appropriate diagnostic test, conducting typhoid fever diagnosis only on patients with high-grade fever could dramatically decrease the costs associated with diagnosis while having no detrimental impact on the ability to accurately diagnose the illness.Typhoid fever among hospitalized febrile children in Siem Reap, Cambodia.Typhoid fever was confirmed by positive blood culture in 5 (3.7%) of 134 febrile children hospitalized in Cambodia. Typhoid was suspected in an additional 25 (18.7 %) blood culture-negative children based on: a positive immunoglobulin M lateral flow assay (IgMFA) (16); a positive polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for Salmonella typhi (2); or clinical assessment (7). The specificity of the IgMFA and PCR assays requires further study.Prospective evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test Typhidot for typhoid fever.Typhoid fever still continues to be a major public health problem around the world. A simple, reliable and affordable rapid diagnostic test has been a long felt need of the clinicians. We therefore prospectively evaluated the sensitivity and specificity of Typhidot test.The study was carried out between January 2002 and December 2003, on a total of 563 samples from patients clinically suspected to have typhoid fever; blood culture as well as serum for Typhidot test were received.Of the 563 samples, Typhidot test and blood culture were positive in 36 patients, both the tests were negative for 503 patients. Typhidot test was positive for 9 patients with S. Paratyphi A infection. The sensitivity and specificity of the test using blood culture as gold standard were 92.3 and 98.8 per cent respectively for the typhoid fever.Typhidot test is rapid, easy to perform and reliable test for diagnosing typhoid fever, useful for small less equipped laboratories as well as for those with better facilities.Evaluation in Papua New Guinea of a urine coagglutination test and a Widal slide agglutination test for rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever.Two simple rapid tests for the laboratory diagnosis of typhoid fever were evaluated, a coagglutination test for detecting Salmonella typhi antigens in urine and a Widal slide agglutination for detecting serum antibodies. Ninety-two culture-confirmed typhoid cases were compared with 64 non-typhoid fever patients, 50 close contacts of typhoid patients, 30 vaccinated staff and 72 healthy community members. A strong urine Vi coagglutination was found to be 86.5% sensitive and 91.8% specific for typhoid, but was not always easy to read. The slide Widal H was found to be 99% sensitive and 95% specific whereas the slide Widal O was 98% sensitive and 98% specific. These data suggest that a single slide Widal O, at a reciprocal titre of 40, is the most suitable rapid test for the diagnosis of typhoid in a population with low typhoid antibody levels in the community, few other cross-reacting Salmonella infections, and a tendency for patients to present late in the infection.Diagnosis of enteric fever caused by Salmonella spp. in Vietnam by a monoclonal antibody-based dot-blot ELISA.Enteric fever caused by Salmonella spp. is prevalent in Vietnam. None of the currently available diagnostic methods meets the ideal criteria on rapidity, simplicity, sensitivity, specificity, cost-effectiveness and practicality for developing areas. In this study, a recently developed monoclonal antibody-based dot-blot ELISA was used in comparison with the hemoculture method and the classical Widal test for diagnosis of salmonellosis in 171 Vietnamese patients presenting with clinical features of enteric fever. Urine samples of 50 healthy counterparts were used as negative controls. Salmonella spp. were isolated from 77 of 171 patients (45%) while 98 and 111 patients were positive by dot-blot ELISA and Widal test, respectively. The diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the ELISA performed on three serial urine samples collected at 2 hour intervals of the 171 patients were 92.2%, 71.3%, 80.7%, 72.4% and 91.8%, respectively when compared with the culture method. The Widal test performed on acute and convalescence serum samples showed 87.0%, 46.8%, 68.4%, 60.4% and 83.3% diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive and negative predictive values, respectively when compared with the bacterial culture method. Kappa coefficience revealed very good agreement beyond chance between the MAb-based ELISA and the culture method. The ELISA was not reactive when tested on urine samples of 50 healthy individuals which indicates 100% specificity. The Salmonella antigenuria of the patients as detected by ELISA lasted 10.3+/-3.9 days after initiating antibiotic treatment. The MAb-based dot-blot ELISA is easy to perform. It is rapid, sensitive, specific, inexpensive, and non-invasive and does not require equipment, thus is suitable for developing areas. It can detect acute/recent infection and can be used for evaluation of the efficacy of the treatment.Typhidot M and Diazo test vis-à-vis blood culture and Widal test in the early diagnosis of typhoid fever in children in a resource poor setting.Typhoid fever is a major public health problem. A test which is simple, reliable and can be carried out in small laboratories is the need of the hour. We prospectively evaluated typhidot M and Diazo tests vis-à-vis blood culture and Widal test in children.Patients aged 6 months to 12 years, having fever of more than four days duration with clinical suspicion of typhoid fever were enrolled. Patients in whom other diagnosis was made served as control. The tests under scrutiny were validated against blood culture and then all the four tests were evaluated among patients who presented in the first week of illness.Blood culture was positive in only 27.3% of the cases. Among these culture positive cases, typhidot M test had the highest sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of 90% (95% CI = 74.4-96.5), 100% (95% CI = 90.1-100), 100% (95% CI = 87.5-100), and 92.1% (95% CI = 79.2-97.3) respectively. Diazo test ranked next with sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of 86.7% (95% CI = 70.3-94.7), 85.7% (95% CI = 70.6-93.7), 83.9% (95% CI = 67.4-92.9), 88.2% (95% CI = 73.4-95.3) respectively. Among clinically suspected typhoid cases, the overall sensitivity, of blood culture, Widal, typhidot M, Diazo was 27.3% (95% CI = 19.8- 36.3), 64.6% (95% CI = 55.3-72.9), 89.1% (95% CI = 81.9-93.7), 80.9% (95% CI = 72.6-87.2) respectively. In the first week of illness, typhidot M showed the best sensitivity [86.2% (95% CI = 69.4-94.5)] followed by Diazo [79% (95% CI = 61.6-90.2)], Widal [41.4% (95% CI = 25.5-59.3)] and blood culture [31% (95% CI = 17.3-49.2)].Both Typhidot M and Diazo are good screening tests for the diagnosis of typhoid fever. Typhidot M is superior to Diazo but the latter is more suitable to resource poor settings being economic and easy to perform.A simple and rapid diagnostic test for typhoid fever.Barber protein sensitized latex particles were used in the latex agglutination test for the diagnosis of typhoid fever and the result compared with that of Widal 'O' and 'H' agglutination test. The latex agglutination test was positive in all 20 bacteriologically proved typhoid patients, in 81 of 85 (95.3%) typhoid suspected patients, and only in 2 of 85 (2.3%) blood donors. In contrast, the positive rates were 60% for both 'O' and 'H' Widal agglutinations in bacteriologically proved typhoid patients, 34.2% and 71.7% respectively in typhoid suspected patients, and none of blood donors were positive. The sensitivity and specificity of the latex agglutination test were 100% and 97.6% respectively with positive and negative predictive values of 90.9% and 100% respectively. The latex agglutination test may be particularly useful for the presumptive diagnosis of typhoid fever in remote health centres.Multidrug-resistant typhoid fever with neurologic findings on the Malawi-Mozambique border.Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi causes an estimated 22 million cases of typhoid fever and 216 000 deaths annually worldwide. We investigated an outbreak of unexplained febrile illnesses with neurologic findings, determined to be typhoid fever, along the Malawi-Mozambique border.The investigation included active surveillance, interviews, examinations of ill and convalescent persons, medical chart reviews, and laboratory testing. Classification as a suspected case required fever and ≥1 other finding (eg, headache or abdominal pain); a probable case required fever and a positive rapid immunoglobulin M antibody test for typhoid (TUBEX TF); a confirmed case required isolation of Salmonella Typhi from blood or stool. Isolates underwent antimicrobial susceptibility testing and subtyping by pulsed-field gel electrophoresis (PFGE).We identified 303 cases from 18 villages with onset during March-November 2009; 214 were suspected, 43 were probable, and 46 were confirmed cases. Forty patients presented with focal neurologic abnormalities, including a constellation of upper motor neuron signs (n = 19), ataxia (n = 22), and parkinsonism (n = 8). Eleven patients died. All 42 isolates tested were resistant to ampicillin, chloramphenicol, and trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole; 4 were also resistant to nalidixic acid. Thirty-five of 42 isolates were indistinguishable by PFGE.The unusual neurologic manifestations posed a diagnostic challenge that was resolved through rapid typhoid antibody testing in the field and subsequent blood culture confirmation in the Malawi national reference laboratory. Extending laboratory diagnostic capacity, including blood culture, to populations at risk for typhoid fever in Africa will improve outbreak detection, response, and clinical treatment.Sensitivity and specificity of typhoid fever rapid antibody tests for laboratory diagnosis at two sub-Saharan African sites.To evaluate three commercial typhoid rapid antibody tests for Salmonella Typhi antibodies in patients suspected of having typhoid fever in Mpumalanga, South Africa, and Moshi, United Republic of Tanzania.The diagnostic accuracy of Cromotest(®) (semiquantitative slide agglutination and single tube Widal test), TUBEX(®) and Typhidot(®) was assessed against that of blood culture. Performance was modelled for scenarios with pretest probabilities of 5% and 50%.In total 92 patients enrolled: 53 (57.6%) from South Africa and 39 (42.4%) from the United Republic of Tanzania. Salmonella Typhi was isolated from the blood of 28 (30.4%) patients. The semiquantitative slide agglutination and single-tube Widal tests had positive predictive values (PPVs) of 25.0% (95% confidence interval, CI: 0.6-80.6) and 20.0% (95% CI: 2.5-55.6), respectively. The newer typhoid rapid antibody tests had comparable PPVs: TUBEX(®), 54.1% (95% CI: 36.9-70.5); Typhidot(®) IgM, 56.7% (95% CI: 37.4-74.5); and Typhidot(®) IgG, 54.3% (95% CI: 36.6-71.2). For a pretest probability of 5%, PPVs were: TUBEX(®), 11.0% (95% CI: 6.6-17.9); Typhidot(®) IgM, 9.1% (95% CI: 5.8-14.0); and Typhidot(®) IgG, 11.0% (6.3-18.4). For a pretest probability of 50%, PPVs were: TUBEX(®), 70.2% (95% CI: 57.3-80.5); Typhidot(®) IgM, 65.6% (95% CI: 54.0-75.6); and Typhidot(®) IgG, 70.0% (95% CI: 56.0-81.1).Semiquantitative slide agglutination and single-tube Widal tests performed poorly. TUBEX(®) and Typhidot(®) may be suitable when pretest probability is high and blood cultures are unavailable, but their performance does not justify deployment in routine care settings in sub-Saharan Africa.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever by detection of Barber protein and Vi antigen of Salmonella serotype typhi.Co-agglutination (coagg) and latex agglutination (LA) tests were used for the detection of Salmonella serotype Typhi Vi and Barber protein (BP) antigens in sera from five groups of individuals (A-E). Group A consisted of 30 blood culture-positive cases of typhoid fever and group B consisted of 30 suspected cases of typhoid fever who had sterile blood cultures but positive Widal tests. Thirty cases of pyrexia of unknown origin (PUO) were placed in group C, while group D consisted of 15 cases of septicaemia caused by organisms other than Salmonella serotype Typhi. Group E comprised 50 normal healthy individuals with no history of typhoid fever or TAB vaccination in the previous 5 years. The Vi-LA test performed best with 96.7% of group A sera and 90% of group B sera giving positive results. No false positive results and only 2.58% false negative results were obtained with this test. Considering patients with positive blood culture results or positive Widal tests as true positives, the sensitivities of the Vi-LA, BP-LA, Vi-coagg and BP-coagg tests were 93.3, 91.7, 83.3 and 86.7%, respectively. The specificities of these tests were 100, 98.5, 98.5 and 98.5%, respectively. It is suggested that the Vi-LA test can be used for the rapid and early diagnosis of typhoid fever.Short report: prospective evaluation of a multi-test strip for the diagnoses of scrub and murine typhus, leptospirosis, dengue Fever, and Salmonella typhi infection.A multi-test strip dotblot immunoassay for the diagnosis of typhoid fever, scrub typhus, murine typhus, dengue virus infection and leptospirosis was evaluated in Thai adults presenting to hospital with acute, undifferentiated fever. The kit gave multiple positive test results in 33 of 36 patients with defined infections and was therefore not a useful admission diagnostic tool.Typhoid fever in Kuala Lumpur and a comparative evaluation of two commercial diagnostic kits for the detection of antibodies to Salmonella typhi.The aim of this study was to compare two commercial kits, theTyphidot and the PanBio ELISA with the present Widal test. Demographic data for all serodiagnosed cases for the years 1991-1998 were collected. From this data, 144 were selected as samples for comparative evaluation of the commercial kits. Fifty sera were culture positive for Salmonella typhi, 50 were culture negative but clinically diagnosed as typhoid fever and Widal positive and 44 were serodiagnosed as enteric of which 21 were culture positive for other Salmonella species, 20 were serodiagnosed for other febrile illnesses and three sera culture positive for other species of enterobacteriaceae. The specificity, sensitivity and efficiency of the tests were calculated with the positive culture for S. typhi as the gold standard. Sensitivity, specificity and efficiency of test for Typhidot and Typhidot M kits were 98%, 76.6% and 84.0% and PanBio ELISA were 78%, 80% and 79.9%. The two commercial kits evaluated were found to be less time consuming and easier to perform than Widal. The Typhidot M seems to be a practical alternative in the field and in small hospitals with lesser facilities.Diagnosis of typhoid fever by detection of Salmonella typhi antigen in urine.A monoclonal antibody specific for group D Salmonella antigen 9 was used in an indirect enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for detecting the antigen in urine specimens collected from patients with clinical typhoid fever in Jakarta, Indonesia. The ELISA had a sensitivity of 95% in identifying patients in whom Salmonella typhi was isolated from hemocultures, 73% in patients in whom S. typhi was isolated from stool specimens, and 40% in patients in whom the organism was isolated from bone marrow cultures. Among patients in whom S. typhi was isolated from blood cultures, the ELISA had a sensitivity of 65% when a single urine specimen was examined and 95% when serially collected urine specimens were examined. A dot blot immunoassay performed on a nitrocellulose filter in parallel had a sensitivity of 85%, versus 83% for the plate ELISA in which S. typhi was isolated from blood, bone marrow, and/or stool specimens. Since S. typhi antigen is intermittently excreted in the urine of patients with typhoid fever, serially collected urine from patients with typhoid should be tested for antigen 9.Typhoid outbreak in Songkhla, Thailand 2009-2011: clinical outcomes, susceptibility patterns, and reliability of serology tests.To determine the clinical manifestations and outcomes, the reliability of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi (S ser. Typhi) IgM and IgG rapid tests, and the susceptibility patterns and the response to treatment during the 2009-2011 typhoid outbreak in Songkhla province in Thailand.The medical records of children aged <15 years with S ser. Typhi bacteremia were analysed. The efficacy of the typhoid IgM and IgG rapid tests and susceptibility of the S ser. Typhi to the current main antibiotics used for typhoid (amoxicillin, ampicillin, cefotaxime, ceftriaxone, co-trimoxazole, and ciprofloxacin), were evaluated.S ser. Typhi bacteremia was found in 368 patients, and all isolated strains were susceptible to all 6 antimicrobials tested. Most of the patients were treated with ciprofloxacin for 7-14 days. The median time (IQR) of fever before treatment and duration of fever after treatment were 5 (4, 7) days and 4 (3, 5) days, respectively. Complications of ascites, lower respiratory symptoms, anemia (Hct <30%), and ileal perforation were found in 7, 7, 22, and 1 patients, respectively. None of the patients had recurrent infection or died. The sensitivities of the typhoid IgM and IgG tests were 58.3% and 25.6% respectively, and specificities were 74.1% and 50.5%, respectively.Most of the patients were diagnosed at an early stage and treated with a good outcome. All S ser. Typhi strains were susceptible to standard first line antibiotic typhoid treatment. The typhoid IgM and IgG rapid tests had low sensitivity and moderate specificity.Evaluation of TUBEX-TF and OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo rapid tests to detect Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi infection during a typhoid outbreak in Harare, Zimbabwe.Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi, the causative agent of typhoid, is endemic in most parts of the world especially in Africa. Reliable and rapid diagnosis of the bacterium is therefore critical for confirmation of all suspected typhoid cases. In many parts of Zimbabwe, laboratory capacity to isolate the microorganism by culture method as a way of diagnosis has limitations. In this study, two rapid serological kits, TUBEX-TF and OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo, were evaluated for possible expeditious diagnosis of Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi infection during a typhoid outbreak in Zimbabwe.Blood was collected from patients with clinical signs and symptoms of typhoid in Harare, Zimbabwe during an outbreak. The standard culture method was used to diagnose the disease. Two rapid kits, the TUBEX-TF and OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo, were also used in parallel to diagnose typhoid according to manufacturers' instructions. The diagnostic accuracy of the two kits was evaluated using the culture method as the gold standard.From all the cases diagnosed by the blood culture (n = 136), we enrolled 131 patients for the TUBEX-TF and 136 for the OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo tests. With the culture method as a reference standard, we found that TUBEX-TF test was 100% sensitive and 94.12% specific, with 63.16% positive and 100% negative predictive values (NPVs) and the OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo test was 100% sensitive and 94.35% specific, with 63.16% positive and 100% NPVs.Our results indicated that TUBEX-TF and OnSite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo rapid tests were useful tools for the rapid diagnosis of Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi infection during typhoid outbreaks in Zimbabwe. The tests performed very well in laboratory evaluations of blood culture-confirmed typhoid cases in Harare, Zimbabwe.Standardisation of the Widal test.Optimizing typhoid fever case definitions by combining serological tests in a large population study in Hechi City, China.Blood culture-based diagnosis can only detect a fraction of the total burden of Salmonella enterica subsp. enterica serovar Typhi. The objective of the study was to detect additional typhoid fever cases through serological tests. A total of 1732 prolonged fever episodes were evaluated using three serological tests, Widal, Tubex and Typhidot-M in a typhoid fever endemic area of southern China. A case definition which included a positive Widal test (TO>or=80 & TH>A), a positive Tubex test (>or=4) and a positive Typhidot-M test, increased the detection of cases by more than twofold from 13 to 28 cases. The case definition has a specificity of 100% and a sensitivity of 39%. Case definitions based on combinations of serological tests can detect additional typhoid fever cases with higher specificity than a single serological test. Improved case detection is essential to understand the true disease burden and can help to boost the power of intervention trials.Use of paired serum samples for serodiagnosis of typhoid fever.Using an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay we demonstrate that, in adult patients with typhoid fever, the sensitivity of a serological test based on the detection of anti-lipopolysaccharide immunoglobulin G is increased when used with paired serum samples taken 1 week apart.Clinical value of Tubex and Typhidot rapid diagnostic tests for typhoid fever in an urban community clinic in Bangladesh.Tubex and Typhidot, rapid tests for typhoid fever, performed well in evaluations conducted in hospital settings among patients with culture-confirmed typhoid fever. We evaluated these tests in a community clinic in Bangladesh. Blood samples were obtained from 867 febrile patients for culture, Typhidot and Tubex tests. Considering the 43 blood culture-confirmed cases of typhoid fever as typhoid positive and the 24 other confirmed bacteremia cases as typhoid negative, Tubex was 60% sensitive and 58% specific, with 90% positive and 58% negative predictive values (NPVs); Typhidot was 67% sensitive and 54% specific, with 85% positive and 81% NPVs. When blood culture-negative patients and other bacteremia cases together were considered typhoid negative, positive predictive values were only 14% for Tubex and 13% for Typhidot, increasing to only 38% and 20% when restricted to patients with > or = 7 days of fever. We conclude that the value of Tubex and Typhidot tests for typhoid fever diagnosis in a community clinic in urban Bangladesh is low.A comparative study of the typhidot (Dot-EIA) and Widal tests in blood culture positive cases of typhoid fever.Seventy-six blood culture positive typhoid cases and forty-eight controls were studied. The typhidot test was positive in 74 (97.36%) cases, with a sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of 96%, 89.5%, and 95%, respectively, compared to the Widal test which was positive in 56 (73.68%) cases with a sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value of 72%, 87%, and 87%, respectively (P = 0.001). In the control group, seven (14.5%) cases tested positive for the Widal test and two (4.16%) for the typhidot (P = 0.001), yielding the sensitivity and specificity for the Widal test and the typhidot test of 63% and 83%, and 85% and 97%, respectively. We conclude that the Dot-EIA (enzyme immunoassay; typhidot) is a more sensitive and specific test which is easy to perform and more reliable compared to the Widal test and that it is useful in early therapy.Clinical aspects of typhoid fever in two rural Nigerian hospitals. A prospective study.During a prospective study among 234 patients admitted with fever in two rural hospitals in West and Central Nigeria 38 cases of typhoid fever were found. The diagnosis was based on extensive serological testing in the Netherlands. The diazotest was introduced but appeared not helpful. The ordinary Widal test was not fully reliable. Eighty five percent of the patients responded to chloramphenicol. The course of typhoid fever in West Nigeria was more severe than in Central Nigeria. The findings are compared with those of similar studies of typhoid fever.The dilemma of widal test - which brand to use? a study of four different widal brands: a cross sectional comparative study.Serodiagnosis of typhoid fever by Widal test based on demonstrating the presence of agglutinins (antibodies) in the serum of an infected patient, against the H (flagellar) and O (somatic) antigens of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi has been associated with many debates. This is why the aim of this study was to: (i) Compare the diagnostic accuracy of four different commercial kits used to perform Widal test (Remel, BioSystems, Dialab and Biotec). (ii) Compare the sensitivity and specificity of both anti-O and anti-H antibodies. (iii) Compare the validity of single versus paired serum samples with a rising titer for the diagnosis of typhoid fever.Duplicate serum samples were obtained from 150 patients clinically diagnosed as typhoid fever patients. Moreover, single serum samples were obtained from 25 patients with febrile diseases other than typhoid fever. All samples were tested using the four different Widal brands and Salmonella Typhi IgM anti-LPS ELISA.-The results of Widal tests differed markedly using the four Widal brands in terms of sensitivity and specificity at three cut-off values of 1/80, 1/160 and 1/320. Remel brand gave the highest sensitivities and the lowest specificities and Dialab brand gave the highest specificities and the lowest sensitivities for both anti-O and anti-H antibodies at the three cut-off values.-Four fold rise in the antibodies titer was not demonstrable among clinically diagnosed typhoid fever patients-H agglutinins were less sensitive and less specific than O agglutinins-Widal test results showed marked discrepancies using different Widal brands. None of the serum samples of the typhoid fever patients showed four fold rise in the antibody titers. Raised O agglutinins were of slightly greater diagnostic value than raised H agglutinins.Widal test done sequentially using two brands could be of value in typhoid fever diagnosis. Single serum sample could be used for typhoid fever diagnosis relying on anti O titer.Evaluation of new-generation serologic tests for the diagnosis of typhoid fever: data from a community-based surveillance in Calcutta, India.Although typhoid fever is confirmed by culture of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi, rapid and simple diagnostic serologic tests would be useful in developing countries. We examined the performance of Widal test in a community field site and compared it with Typhidot and Tubex tests for diagnosis of typhoid fever. Blood samples were collected from 6697 patients with fever for > or =3 days for microscopy, culture, and serologic testing and from randomly selected 172 consenting healthy individuals to assess the baseline Widal anti-Typhi O lipopolysaccharide antibody (anti-TO) and anti-Typhi H flagellar antibody (anti-TH) titers. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) of the 3 serologic tests were calculated using culture-confirmed typhoid fever cases as "true positives" and paratyphoid fever and malaria cases as "true negatives". Comparing cutoff values for the Widal test, an anti-TO titer of 1/80 was optimal with 58% sensitivity, 85% specificity, 69% PPV, and 77% NPV. Sensitivity was increased to 67% when the Widal test was done on the 5th day of illness and thereafter. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of Typhidot and Tubex were not better than Widal test. There is a need for more efficient rapid diagnostic test for typhoid fever especially during the acute stage of the disease. Until then, culture remains the method of choice.Evaluation of a simple and rapid dipstick assay for the diagnosis of typhoid fever in Indonesia.To support the clinical diagnosis of typhoid fever in Indonesia, where most hospitals and health centres have no facilities for culture, a rapid dipstick assay for the detection of Salmonella typhi-specific IgM antibodies was evaluated on serum samples from 127 patients clinically suspected of having typhoid fever. In a single blood sample collected on admission to hospital, the sensitivity of the dipstick assay was 69.8% when compared with bone marrow culture and 86.5% when compared with blood culture. The specificity as calculated for the group of patients with suspected typhoid fever but a negative culture result was calculated to be 88.9%. Of 80 patients with febrile illnesses other than typhoid fever, reactivity was observed in only three patients with dengue haemorrhagic fever. The assay uses stabilised components that can be stored outside the refrigerator, does not require special equipment, and may be of use in remote health facilities that have no culture facilities.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever by co-agglutination in an Indian hospital.Detection of Salmonella typhi infection by a co-agglutination assay for specific O, H and Vi antigens and by blood culture were compared for 110 patients with suspected typhoid fever. Blood cultures were positive for S. typhi in 25.5% of patients. Co-agglutination tests with patients' serum and with blood culture supernates gave positive results in 70.9% and 67.3% of cases respectively. S. typhi antigens Hd and O9 were detected in patients' serum by co-agglutination in 96.4% of blood culture-positive, and 62.2% of blood culture-negative patients. Co-agglutination results were uniformly negative with serum samples from a control group of 50 healthy individuals, 20 patients with febrile non-typhoid infectious disease and 20 patients with non-infectious febrile disease. Of the 25 patients with suspected typhoid fever who had not received prior antibiotic treatment, 88% yielded positive blood cultures and 96% gave positive results in serum co-agglutination tests. By contrast, of the 85 patients who had received prior antibiotics, only 7% yielded positive blood cultures, but 63.5% gave positive results in serum co-agglutination tests. Co-agglutination tests with serum offer a simple, rapid, sensitive, specific and economical method for the early diagnosis of typhoid fever.The TUBEX typhoid test detects current Salmonella infections.Evaluation of the diagnostic accuracy of a typhoid IgM flow assay for the diagnosis of typhoid fever in Cambodian children using a Bayesian latent class model assuming an imperfect gold standard.Rapid diagnostic tests are needed for typhoid fever (TF) diagnosis in febrile children in endemic areas. Five hundred children admitted to the hospital in Cambodia between 2009 and 2010 with documented fever (≥ 38°C) were investigated using blood cultures (BCs), Salmonella Typhi/Paratyphi A real-time polymerase chain reactions (PCRs), and a Typhoid immunoglobulin M flow assay (IgMFA). Test performance was determined by conventional methods and Bayesian latent class modeling. There were 32 cases of TF (10 BC- and PCR-positive cases, 14 BC-positive and PCR-negative cases, and 8 BC-negative and PCR-positive cases). IgMFA sensitivity was 59.4% (95% confidence interval = 41-76), and specificity was 97.8% (95% confidence interval = 96-99). The model estimate sensitivity for BC was 81.0% (95% credible interval = 54-99). The model estimate sensitivity for PCR was 37.8% (95% credible interval = 26-55), with a specificity of 98.2% (95% credible interval = 97-99). The model estimate sensitivity for IgMFA (≥ 2+) was 77.9% (95% credible interval = 58-90), with a specificity of 97.5% (95% credible interval = 95-100). The model estimates of IgMFA sensitivity and specificity were comparable with BCs and better than estimates using conventional analysis.Detection of Salmonella typhi protein antigen in serum and urine: a value for diagnosis of typhoid fever in an endemic area.Using haemoculture as the gold standard, a double antibody sandwich ELISA for the detection of Salmonella typhi Barber protein antigen (BP) was compared with the Widal test. Specimens used were serum and urine obtained from normal healthy individuals and from patients with typhoid fever, paratyphoid fever, pyrexia caused by other bacteria and pyrexia with negative haemoculture. The ELISA for antigenuria gave a significantly higher sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and positive predictive value than the Widal test (p less than 0.05). The ELISA for antigenaemia gave a significantly higher sensitivity and positive predictive value only. All other values were not significantly different. The timing of specimen collection was critical for sensitivity in the ELISA for antigenaemia and antigenuria, and the best results could be obtained by carrying out both assays simultaneously. The clearance of BP from serum into urine occurred around 16 days after the onset of fever in one patient. In two patients, BP could be detected in sera up to 3 weeks after the onset of fever. In two patients, serum BP could still be detected although haemoculture was negative.Development of a one-step immunochromatographic strip test using gold nanoparticles for the rapid detection of Salmonella typhi in human serum.An immunochromatographic strip test using gold nanoparticles was developed for the rapid detection of Salmonella typhi (S. typhi) in human serum. The strip test based on the principle of sandwich immunoassay by the specific binding of antigens from S. typhi O901 and antibody of S. typhi O901 on a nitrocellulose membrane. Antibody-gold nanoparticle conjugate was used as the label and was coated onto a glass fiber membrane, which was used as a conjugate pad. To create a test and control zone, antibody of S. typhi O901 and an anti-IgG were dotted on the nitrocellulose membrane, respectively. Positive samples were displayed as red dots at the test and control zones of the nitrocellulose membrane, while negative samples resulted in a red dot only in the control zone. The limit of detection (LOD) was found to be 1.14×10(5) cfu mL(-1), which could be visually detected by the naked eye within 15 min. This strip test provided a lower detection limit and analysis time than a dot blot immunoassay (8.88×10(6) cfu mL(-1) for LOD and 110 min for reaction time). In addition, our immunochromatographic strip test was employed to detect S. typhi in human serum effectively, with high accuracy. This strip test offers great promise for a rapid, simple and low-cost analysis of S. typhi.Evaluation of a typhoid/paratyphoid diagnostic assay (TPTest) detecting anti-Salmonella IgA in secretions of peripheral blood lymphocytes in patients in Dhaka, Bangladesh.Rapid and reliable diagnostic assays for enteric (typhoid and paratyphoid) fever are urgently needed. We report the characterization of novel approach utilizing lymphocyte secretions, for diagnosing patients with enteric fever by the TPTest procedure.TPTest detects Salmonella-specific IgA responses in lymphocyte culture supernatant. We utilized TPTest in patients with suspected enteric fever, patients with other illnesses, and healthy controls. We also evaluated simplified modifications of TPTest for adaptation in laboratories with limited facilities and equipment.TPTest was positive in 39 (27 typhoid and 12 paratyphoid A) patients confirmed by blood culture and was negative in 74 healthy individuals. Among 32 individuals with other illnesses, 29 were negative by TPTest. Of 204 individuals with suspected enteric fever who were negative by blood culture, 44 were positive by TPTest and the patients were clinically indistinguishable from patients with confirmed bacteremia, except they were more likely to be under 5 years of age. We evaluated simplifications in TPTest, including showing that lymphocytes could be recovered using lysis buffer or buffy coat method as opposed to centrifugation, that incubation of cells at 37°C did not require supplemental CO2, and that results were available for majority of samples within 24 hours. Positive results by TPTest are transient and revert to negative during convalescence, supporting use of the test in endemic areas. The results can also be read using immunodot blot approach as opposed to ELISA. Since no true gold standard currently exists, we used a number of definitions of true positives and negatives. TPTest had sensitivity of 100% compared to blood culture, and specificity that ranged from 78-97% (73-100, 95% CI), depending on definition of true negative.The TPTest is useful for identification of patients with enteric fever in an endemic area, and additional development of simplified TPTest is warranted.One-step 2-minute test to detect typhoid-specific antibodies based on particle separation in tubes.Typhoid fever is caused by Salmonella typhi. Detection of anti-S. typhi antibodies in the patient is a useful diagnostic aid. Among the various methods developed over the years for this purpose, the Widal test, based on bacterial agglutination, has remained the most widely used, even though it is neither specific nor sensitive. Its popularity stems from the fact that it is simple to use and inexpensive. We describe a new test which also uses a simple one-step procedure but is more rapid and accurate than the Widal. The new test (TUBEX) detects anti-Salmonella O9 (both immunoglobulin M [IgM] and IgG) antibodies in patients by inhibiting the binding between an anti-O9 IgM monoclonal antibody (MAb) conjugated to colored latex particles and S. typhi lipopolysaccharide (LPS) conjugated to magnetic latex particles. The reactants are mixed in a specially designed microtube for 2 min, and the result is read based on the resultant color of the supernatant following forced sedimentation of the magnetic beads. In the absence of inhibitory antibodies, there is a color change (from blue to red) due to cosedimentation of the indicator particles with the magnetic particles, whereas if these antibodies are present, they prevent such a change to a degree dependent on their concentration. Preliminary examination of TUBEX using the anti-O9 MAb and irrelevant MAbs as inhibitors revealed the test to be specific and reproducible, with an analytical sensitivity of 16 micrograms per ml of antibody. The reagents remained stable for at least 9 months when kept at 4 degrees C. In the examination of 16 stored sera obtained from 14 patients with proven cases of typhoid fever and 78 serum samples from 75 subjects without typhoid fever, TUBEX was found to be 100% sensitive and 100% specific. The nontyphoid group comprised 26 healthy blood donors, 30 antinuclear antibody (ANA)-negative patients, 9 ANA-positive patients, of whom 1 was positive for anti-DNA antibody, 4 typhus patients, and 6 septicemic patients. In addition, the sera obtained from 11 patients clinically diagnosed as having typhoid fever were all positive in the test. The TUBEX results correlated to some extent, albeit insignificantly (r = 0.38, P = 0.07), with those of an enzyme-linked immunoassay (ELISA) which used a similar detection format (inhibition) and reagents (S. typhi LPS and anti-O9 antibody). TUBEX correlated very well with ELISAs which detected anti-S. typhi LPS IgM (r = 0.58, P = 0.003) or IgG (r = 0.54, P = 0.006) antibodies from the typhoid patients. There was no correlation with the Widal test. The TUBEX test, if performed on slides (instead of tubes) or with soluble antigen (instead of antigen-conjugated magnetic beads), suffered significantly in sensitivity. Direct agglutination tests using LPS-conjugated indicator particles performed either on slides or in microwells also failed to detect antibodies from the majority of typhoid patients. Thus, TUBEX appears to be well designed and well suited for use in the laboratory or by the bedside as a simple, rapid aid to the routine diagnosis of typhoid fever.Comparison of the diagnostic value of local Widal slide test with imported Widal slide test.A laboratory study comparing the Widal slide agglutination test using local antigens produced by Mekar Jaya Diagnostica (SAT-MJD) with imported antigens (Murex, Abbott) was carried out on 55 sera of typhoid fever patients with positive blood culture and 56 sera of non-typhoid febrile patients. The SAT-MJD antigens consisted of a mixture of 5 different phage-types of S. typhi dominantly found in Indonesia. This study revealed the following results: the diagnostic sensitivity of local and imported antigens was 83.93%, the diagnostic specificity of local antigens was higher than the imported antigens ie 82.14% compared with 64.28%, the diagnostic efficiency of local antigens was 82.88% compared with 73.87% of the imported antigens. The diagnostic positive and negative predictive values of the local antigens were 80.70% and 83.63%, respectively. The imported antigen revealed diagnostic positive and negative predictive values of 69.69% and 80%, respectively. The diagnostic specificity and efficiency of local antigens were significantly different (p < 0.02 and p < 0.05) from the imported antigens. The local antigens have some advantages. There was no variation in within-run and between-day test, compared with a 6.6% variation shown by the imported antigen. The test results obtained 5 minutes after mixing the serum with antigens reduced the possibility of false-positive and false-negative results. The cost of local antigens is lower than the imported antigens. Based on these data, the Widal SAT-MJD has a reliable diagnostic value and can be used in small laboratories, such as primary health centers (Puskesmas).Evaluation of a simple blood culture amplification and antigen detection method for diagnosis of Salmonella enterica serovar typhi bacteremia.In most areas where typhoid is endemic, laboratory diagnosis is not possible due to the lack of appropriate facilities. We investigated whether the combination of blood culture amplification of Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi with an S. Typhi antigen rapid diagnostic test (RDT) could be an accurate and inexpensive tool for the accelerated diagnosis of patients with acute typhoid in Laos. For a panel of 23 Gram-negative reference pathogens, the Standard Diagnostics (catalog no. 15FK20; Kyonggi-do, South Korea) RDT gave positive results for S. Typhi NCTC 8385, S. Typhi NCTC 786 (Vi negative), Salmonella enterica serovar Enteritidis (ATCC 13076), and Salmonella enterica serovar Ndolo NCTC 8700 (all group D). In a prospective study of 6,456 blood culture bottles from 3,028 patients over 15 months, 392 blood culture bottles (6.1%) from 221 (7.3%) patients had Gram-negative rods (GNRs) seen in the blood culture fluid. The sensitivity, negative predictive value, specificity, and positive predictive value were 96.7%, 99.5%, 97.9%, and 87.9%, respectively, for patients with proven S. Typhi bacteremia and 91.2%, 98.4%, 98.9%, and 93.9% for patients with group D Salmonella. The median (range) number of days between diagnosis by RDT and reference assays was 1 (-1 to +2) day for those with confirmed S. Typhi. The use of antigen-based pathogen detection in blood culture fluid may be a useful, relatively rapid, inexpensive, and accurate technique for the identification of important causes of bacteremia in the tropics.Comparative evaluation of latex agglutination (LAT) and coagglutination (COAG) tests for rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever.Comparison of serological test kits for diagnosis of typhoid fever in the Philippines.We evaluated four recent antibody-detection kits for typhoid fever by using 177 febrile patients from our hospital, in 75 of whom Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi grew. TUBEX performed best, achieving 94.7% sensitivity and 80.4% specificity. Typhidot, SD Bioline Typhoid, and Mega Salmonella were less specific and, in most cases, less sensitive.Comparison of a rapid commercial test, Enterocheck WB(®), with automated blood culture for diagnosis of typhoid fever.Rapid diagnosis of typhoid fever is very important in the timely initiation of therapy.To evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of the Enterocheck WB(®) test.In a prospective study, the sensitivity and specificity of Enterocheck WB(®) that detects IgM antibodies to Salmonella typhi were compared with blood culture using BacT/Alert.Four hundred and fifty patients with suspected typhoid fever were assessed both by blood culture and Enterocheck WB(®); 100 of them were either Enterocheck WB(®)-positive or blood culture-positive or both for S. typhi. Both tests were positive in 47 of the 100 patients. In 45 patients, Enterocheck WB(®) was positive but blood culture was negative. In eight cases, Enterocheck was negative but blood culture was positive. Using blood culture as the gold standard, the sensitivity of Enterocheck WB(®) was 85.5%, specificity 88.6%, negative predictive value 97.7% and positive predictive value 51.1%.The Enterocheck WB(®) test can be performed at the bedside in 15 minutes and is a useful rapid method for diagnosis of typhoid fever.Detection of IgM antibody against region IV flagellin of Salmonella paratyphi A.Salmonella paratyphi A is a pathogenic bacterium that causes paratyphoid fever. The current laboratory diagnostic techniques are unsatisfactory. To improve diagnosis, a plasmid (pSK-8E) encoding phase 1 flagellin gene nucleotide position 452-890 from S. paratyphi A has been constructed. The recombinant protein expressed from the plasmid has been used to develop an indirect ELISA for IgM antibody detection. Sera from patients with hemoculture positive for S. paratyphi A, S. typhi, other gram-positive and gram-negative bacteria, and dengue hemorrhagic fever as well as from healthy control subjects were tested. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the test were 56.9%, 98.8%, 90.6% and 92.1%, respectively. Since the sensitivity was low, the explanation for this result was investigated. It was found that the sensitivity of the test could be increased to 83.3% if the sera were obtained 9-12 days after onset of fever. The sera obtained earlier or later gave only 33.3% and 66.6% sensitivity, respectively. This result suggests that the IgM antibody detection assay which we have developed is a valuable tool for diagnosis of S. paratyphi A infection when the serum samples are taken at the appropriate time.Diagnosis of typhoid fever by Dot enzyme immunoassay in an endemic region.To compare the results of Dot Enzyme Immunoassay (EIA) and concomitantly performed blood culture for the diagnosis of typhoid fever.The results of Dot Enzyme Immunoassay (EIA) of patients who also had blood cultures/bone marrow culture performed at the same time were analyzed. The period of study spans between April 1997-September 1997.A total of 1760 Dot Enzyme Immunoassays were performed from April 1997 to September 1997. Of these, only 128 (7.2%) cases had concomitantly performed blood/bone marrow cultures. Therefore, the study was narrowed down to these 128 cases. Sixty-nine cases were culture positive for S. typhi. Of these culture proven cases, IgM antibodies by Dot EIA were positive only in 49 (71%) cases while 20 (28.9%) of culture proven cases remained negative for IgM antibodies.Taking blood/bone marrow culture as gold standard, the sensitivity of Dot EIA was found to be 71% while specificity was found to be 43%. The predictive value of the positive test was found to be 59.7% and that of a negative test was found to be 56.5%.The diagnostic accuracy of three rapid diagnostic tests for typhoid fever at Chittagong Medical College Hospital, Chittagong, Bangladesh.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of three rapid diagnostic tests (RDTs) for typhoid fever in febrile hospitalised patients in Bangladesh.Febrile adults and children admitted to Chittagong Medical College Hospital, Bangladesh, were investigated with Bact/Alert(®) blood cultures and real-time PCR to detect Salmonella enterica Typhi and Paratyphi A and assays for Rickettsia, leptospirosis and dengue fever. Acute serum samples were examined with the LifeAssay (LA) Test-it™ Typhoid IgM lateral flow assay detecting IgM antibodies against S. Typhi O antigen, CTKBiotech Onsite Typhoid IgG/IgM Combo Rapid-test cassette lateral flow assay detecting IgG and IgM antibodies against S. Typhi O and H antigens and SD Bioline line assay for IgG and IgM antibodies against S. Typhi proteins.In 300 malaria smear-negative febrile patients [median (IQR) age of 13.5 (5-31) years], 34 (11.3%) had confirmed typhoid fever: 19 positive by blood culture for S. Typhi (three blood PCR positive) and 15 blood culture negative but PCR positive for S. Typhi in blood. The respective sensitivity and specificity of the three RDTs in patients using a composite reference standard of blood culture and/or PCR-confirmed typhoid fever were 59% and 61% for LifeAssay, 59% and 74% for the CTK IgM and/or IgG, and 24% and 96% for the SD Bioline RDT IgM and/or IgG. The LifeAssay RDT had a sensitivity of 63% and a specificity of 91% when modified with a positive cut-off of ≥2+ and analysed using a Bayesian latent class model.These typhoid RDTs demonstrated moderate diagnostic accuracies, and better tests are needed.Typhoid is over-reported in Embu and Nairobi, Kenya.The paper looks at the usefulness of the Widal agglutination test in the context of variable normal antibody titres in two different populations in Kenya, and in comparison to the blood culture method of diagnosis. It presents a prospective case-control study. We examined 846 blood cultures and an equal number of serum samples, and 782 stools from adults who presented at two study sites; Kenyatta National Hospital and one hospital and 3 clinics in Embu District, with symptoms similar to typhoid. Examined also were 360 serum samples and stools from adults who were apparently healthy (controls) who sought routine medical examination at the study sites. From blood cultures, isolation rates for typhoid for Embu (3% ) and Nairobi (2.2%) were not significantly different (p>0.01). In addition the control population from the two study sites did not show any significant background O antibody titre levels characteristic of typhoid endemic areas. All the 7 commonly available Widal test kits including Murex, Europath, Biotech, Humatex, Biosystems, Microsystems and Typhex, that were evaluated for efficacy were equally specific in diagnosis of typhoid by Widal agglutination methods. However, there were minor differences in the sensitivities of the kits. The Widal test method gave a lower sensitivity (81.3%) than specificity (93%) when compared to the culture of blood for diagnosis of typhoid. Going by the reports of typhoid outbreaks in Embu and Nairobi (ca. 20-25% reported prevalence) we conclude that there has been over-reporting probably due to poor methodologies of performing the Widal test. We recommend adequate clinical examination in suspected cases of typhoid in addition to proper Widal in order to improve typhoid diagnosis. Newer improved methods that are more specific and sensitive than the Widal test need to be evaluated in improving laboratory diagnosis of typhoid.Latex agglutination test (LAT) for the diagnosis of typhoid fever.Typhidot test to detect IgG & IgM antibodies in typhoid fever.As typhoid fever is endemic in India, there is a continuing search for a simple test which can be carried out in small laboratories for an early and rapid diagnosis. We have evaluated the Typhidot test for this purpose.The Typhidot test was carried out on coded sera according to the manufacturer's instructions. The test was performed on 30 Widal positive sera, 30 sera from blood culture positive patients, 60 Widal negative sera and 30 samples from patients whose blood culture grew Gram negative bacilli (GNB) other than Salmonella Typhi.Typhidot test was positive for both IgG and IgM in 39 samples, IgM alone in 24 and IgG alone in 2. Of the 30 culture positive samples, 27 were positive by Typhidot. The Typhidot test gave a sensitivity of 100 per cent and specificity of 80 per cent when bacteraemic patients were analysed.The Typhidot is easy to perform, and requires no special equipment or training of staff for interpretation of results. It will be a useful complementary test to blood culture and the Widal test in the diagnosis of typhoid fever.Laboratory evaluation of a simple and rapid latex agglutination assay for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever.A latex agglutination assay for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever was evaluated on samples collected from patients with clinical suspicion of typhoid fever in South Sulawesi, Indonesia, where the disease is endemic. The latex assay is very easy to use, gives a rapid result and may be used as a point-of-care diagnostic test. For acute phase samples collected on average 6 days after the onset of illness, the sensitivity is 42.5% for culture-confirmed patients with typhoid fever and the specificity is 96.9%. The sensitivity improved with the duration of illness from 30.8% for samples collected during the first 4-5 days of illness to 45.5% for samples collected between days 7 and 9, and to 84.6% for the samples collected more than 9 days after the onset of illness. Testing of follow-up samples may further improve sensitivity by demonstrating seroconversion.Simple, rapid, and affordable point-of-care test for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever.We developed a point-of-care test for the serodiagnosis of typhoid fever in the format of an immunochromatographic lateral flow assay. The flow assay for typhoid fever is based on the detection of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi lipopolysaccharide-specific immunoglobulin M (IgM) antibodies. The assay was evaluated on serum samples collected in a hospital in South Sulawesi, Indonesia, where typhoid fever is endemic, and the results were compared with culture and Widal test. The sensitivity of this typhoid fever IgM flow assay for samples collected at 1st diagnosis from patients with culture-confirmed typhoid fever was determined to be 59.3%. The sensitivity ranged from 41.2% to 89.5%, depending on the duration of illness. A specificity of 97.8% was calculated based on results obtained for patients with clinical suspicion of typhoid fever that was later excluded. The assay is ideal for use as a point-of-care test in health care centers that lack the expertise and facilities to perform culture or the less specific Widal test. Because of its simplicity, the assay may also be used as a field test in remote areas.Retrospective review of dot enzyme immunoassay test for typhoid fever in an endemic area.Typhoid fever remains a common problem in Malaysia, but for its diagnosis both blood culture and the Widal test have drawbacks. A dot enzyme immunoassay (EIA) has been developed which detects IgM and IgG antibodies to a specific 50 kDa outer membrane protein on Salmonella typhi. This study was performed among outpatients attending the university hospital in Kelantan, a state on the east coast of Peninsular Malaysia where typhoid is endemic. The dot EIA was done on 149 outpatients of all ages in whom typhoid was suspected. Of these, 60 were not analysable due to insufficient data. The other 89 were retrospectively classed as typhoid (total = 21), or not typhoid (total = 68). The criteria for diagnosis of typhoid was either, blood culture was positive, or with blood culture negative, temperature was at least 38 degrees C and Widal O and/or H titer greater than or equal to 1/160. We then compared the diagnosis with the EIA result. For the result where either IgM or IgG was positive, sensitivity was 90%, specificity 91% and negative predictive value 97%. For IgM positive, specificity was 100%. But the specificity of IgG positive alone was reduced by six false positives, which were probably due to persistence of IgG after acute infection. Other cases were found where IgG positive alone appeared in the first week of typhoid fever, probably due to rapid response in a second or subsequent infection. We also found that IgM-producing patients were significantly younger than those showing IgG alone positive.Evaluation of a newly developed ELISA against Widal, TUBEX-TF and Typhidot for typhoid fever surveillance.Typhoid fever is endemic in many parts of the world and represents a major cause of acute febrile illness (AFI). Rapid and accurate laboratory methods for diagnosis of this disease are needed for both patient care and surveillance situations.Serum samples were collected from AFI patients and used to evaluate the performance of a newly developed ELISA assay that uses a mixture of somatic and flagellar antigens to detect the total antibody response against Salmonella enterica subspecies enterica serovar Typhi (S. Typhi) infection. The levels of Ig isotype response (IgG, IgM and IgA) were also evaluated, and results were compared to those of TUBEX-TF and Typhidot commercial kits. Of 234 culture-confirmed typhoid patients, the total Ig ELISA diagnosed 93% compared to 71% using Widal test. This sensitivity level (93%) is higher than that observed for the individual Ig ELISAs (IgG 75%; IgM 79%; IgA 57%) and the commercial tests TUBEX-TF (75%), Typhidot IgM (63%) and Typhidot IgG (28%). An agreement of 78% was achieved between the total Ig ELISA and Widal test. The average specificity of the ELISA was 96%. Using ELISA, up to 200 samples can be tested per run with cost per test at US$0.20.The developed ELISA shows superior sensitivity and specificity, when compared to Widal, TUBEX-TF and Typhidot assays, is more cost effective and allows higher throughput. This method is highly recommended for active surveillance studies or outbreak investigations of typhoid fever.The Widal slide agglutination test, a valuable rapid diagnostic test in typhoid fever patients at the Infectious Diseases Hospital of Jakarta.The Widal slide agglutination test was evaluated as a rapid diagnostic test in typhoid fever patients at the Infectious Diseases Hospital, Jakarta, Indonesia from 1980-1982. The results of the test can be available within 45 minutes of patient admission. The study showed that, among 229 patients with Salmonella typhi-positive typhoid fever and 179 control fever patients, when the Widal O antibody titer was greater than or equal to 1:20 the sensitivity was 53%, the specificity 98%, the positive predictive value 96%, and the negative predictive value 68%. A negative Widal test (O antibody titer less than 1:20) does not provide useful information, but when the O antibody titer is greater than or equal to 1:20 the clinician at the Infectious Diseases Hospital of Jakarta can be 96% certain that the patient has typhoid fever.Comparison of rapid serodiagnostic tests for antigen detection in typhoid fever.Combined rapid (TUBEX) test for typhoid-paratyphoid A fever based on strong anti-O12 response: design and critical assessment of sensitivity.Rapid diagnostics can be accurate but, often, those based on antibody detection for infectious diseases are unwittingly underrated for various reasons. Herein, we described the development of a combined rapid test for two clinically-indistinguishable bacterial diseases, typhoid and paratyphoid A fever, the latter fast emerging as a global threat. By using monoclonal antibodies (mAbs) to bacterial antigens of known chemical structures as probes, we were able to dissect the antibody response in patients at the level of monosaccharides. Thus, a mAb specific for a common lipopolysaccharide antigen (O12) found in both the causative organisms was employed to semi-quantify the amounts of anti-O12 antibodies present in both types of patients in an epitope-inhibition particle-based (TUBEX) immunoassay. This colorimetric assay detected not only anti-O12 antibodies that were abundantly produced, but also, by steric hindrance, antibodies to an adjoining epitope (O9 or O2 in the typhoid or paratyphoid bacillus, respectively). Sensitivity and, particularly, reaction intensities, were significantly better than those obtained using an anti-O9 or anti-O2 mAb-probe in the examination of paired sera from 22 culture-confirmed typhoid patients (sensitivity, 81.8% vs 75.0%) or single sera from 36 culture-confirmed paratyphoid patients (52.8% vs 28.6), respectively. Importantly, sensitivity was better (97.1% for typhoid, 75.0% for paratyphoid) if allowance was made for the absence of relevant antibodies in certain specimens as determined by an independent, objective assay (ELISA)--such specimens might have been storage-denatured (especially the older paratyphoid samples) or procured from non-responders. Benchmarking against ELISA, which revealed high concordance between the two tests, was useful and more appropriate than comparing with culture methods as traditionally done, since antibody tests and culture target slightly different stages of these diseases. Paired sera analysis was insightful, revealing 64% of typhoid patients who had no change in antibody titer over 4-16 days, and 14% with no IgM-IgG class-switching.Assessment and comparative analysis of a rapid diagnostic test (Tubex®) for the diagnosis of typhoid fever among hospitalized children in rural Tanzania.Typhoid fever remains a significant health problem in many developing countries. A rapid test with a performance comparable to that of blood culture would be highly useful. A rapid diagnostic test for typhoid fever, Tubex®, is commercially available that uses particle separation to detect immunoglobulin M directed towards Salmonella Typhi O9 lipopolysaccharide in sera.We assessed the sensitivity and specificity of the Tubex test among Tanzanian children hospitalized with febrile illness using blood culture as gold standard. Evaluation was done considering blood culture confirmed S. Typhi with non-typhi salmonella (NTS) and non - salmonella isolates as controls as well as with non-salmonella isolates only.Of 139 samples tested with Tubex, 33 were positive for S. Typhi in blood culture, 49 were culture-confirmed NTS infections, and 57 were other non-salmonella infections. Thirteen hemolyzed samples were excluded. Using all non - S. Typhi isolates as controls, we showed a sensitivity of 79% and a specificity of 89%. When the analysis was repeated excluding NTS from the pool of controls we showed a sensitivity of 79% and a specificity of 97%. There was no significant difference in the test performance using the two different control groups (p > 0.05).This first evaluation of the Tubex test in an African setting showed a similar performance to those seen in some Asian settings. Comparison with the earlier results of a Widal test using the same samples showed no significant difference (p > 0.05) for any of the performance indicators, irrespective of the applied control group.Clinical application of a dot blot test for diagnosis of enteric fever due to Salmonella enterica serovar typhi in patients with typhoid fever from Colombia and Peru.Clinical application of a dot blot test to detect immunoglobulin G (IgG) (88% sensitivity and specificity) and IgM (12.1% sensitivity and 97% specificity) against flagellar antigen from Salmonella enterica serovar Typhi was performed in Peruvian and Colombian patients with typhoid fever. This test can be used as a good predictor of serovar Typhi infection in regions lacking laboratory facilities and in field studies.Longevity of antibody responses to a Salmonella typhi-specific outer membrane protein: interpretation of a dot enzyme immunosorbent assay in an area of high typhoid fever endemicity.The objective of this study was to investigate the longevity of positive dot enzyme immunosorbent assay (dot EIA) results for IgM and IgG to a Salmonella typhi outer membrane protein in Malaysian children with enteric fever. The patients were children one month to 12 years of age with clinical evidence of typhoid fever, positive blood or stool cultures for S. typhi, and/or a positive Widal test result who were admitted over a two-year period to General Hospital (Kota Bharu, Malaysia). These patients received standard inpatient treatment for enteric fever including chloramphenicol therapy for 14 days. Dot EIA tests were performed as part of clinical and laboratory assessments on admission, at two weeks, and then at 3, 6, 9, 12, 15, 18, and 21 months postdischarge. Assessment of the longevity of positive dot EIA IgM and IgG titers was done by Kaplan-Meier analysis. In 94 evaluable patients, 28% were dot EIA IgM positive but IgG negative on admission, 50% were both IgM and IgG positive, and 22% were IgM negative and IgG positive. Mean persistence of IgM dot EIA positivity was 2.6 months (95% confidence interval = 2.0-3.1 months) and that of IgG was 5.4 months (4.5-6.3 months). There were no significant differences between the three subgroups. Thus, positive IgM and IgG results determined by dot EIA within four and seven months, respectively, following documented or suspected enteric fever in a child from an endemic area should be interpreted with caution. In other clinical situations, the dot EIA remains a rapid and reliable aid to diagnosis.Evaluation of rapid diagnostic tests for typhoid fever.Laboratory diagnosis of typhoid fever requires isolation and identification of Salmonella enterica serotype Typhi. In many areas where this disease is endemic, laboratory capability is limited. Recent advances in molecular immunology have led to the identification of sensitive and specific markers for typhoid fever and technology to manufacture practical and inexpensive kits for their rapid detection. We evaluated three commercial kits for serologic diagnosis of typhoid fever. Patients presenting with > or = 4 days of fever were enrolled at two hospitals in Southern Vietnam. Cases were patients with serotype Typhi isolated from blood samples, and controls were patients with other laboratory-confirmed illnesses. Serotype Typhi isolates were confirmed and tested for antimicrobial susceptibility at the Pasteur Institute in Ho Chi Minh City. The Widal test was run at the hospitals and the Pasteur Institute. Sera were shipped frozen to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and tested by using Multi-Test Dip-S-Ticks, TyphiDot, and TUBEX to detect immunoglobulin G (IgG), IgG and IgM, and IgM, respectively. Package insert protocol instructions were followed. We enrolled 59 patients and 21 controls. The sensitivity and specificity findings were as follows: 89 and 53% for Multi-Test Dip-S-Ticks, 79 and 89% for TyphiDot, 78 and 89% for TUBEX, and 64 and 76% for Widal testing in hospitals and 61% and 100% for Widal testing at the Pasteur Institute. For all assays, the sensitivity was highest in the second week of illness. The Widal test was insensitive and displayed interoperator variability. Two rapid kits, TyphiDot and TUBEX, demonstrated promising results.Comparison between DOT EIA IgM and Widal Test as early diagnosis of typhoid fever.A recently developed DOT enzyme immunoassay known as "Typhidot" for detecting IgM antibody against 50 KDa OMP antigen of Salmonella typhi, was evaluated on 100 clinically suspected typhoid fever cases and 40 age-sex matched controls, in the Department of Microbiology, Mymensingh Medical College during, the period from June 2006 to July 2007. Blood culture, Widal test, and DOT EIA for IgM test were performed in all patients. Among 100 clinically suspected typhoid fever cases, 35 were subsequently confirmed on the basis of positive blood culture for S. typhi and/or significant rising titre of Widal test. The DOT EIA IgM test could produce results within 1 hour. The result of the DOT EIA IgM test showed a good diagnostic value for typhoid fever. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of the test was found as 91.42%, 90.00%, 88.88% and 92.30% respectively. On the other hand corresponding values for Widal test were of 42.85%, 85.00%, 71.42% and 62.96% respectively. Thus, The DOT EIA IgM seems to be a practical alternative to Widal test for early diagnosis of typhoid fever.